Introduction to CIVIL AIR PATROL CAP Pamphlet 50-5 1 August 2002 PUBLISHED BY NATIONAL HEADQUARTERS CIVIL AIR PATROL MAXWELL AIR FORCE BASE, ALABAMA Supersedes CAPM 50-1, 1 November 1990 PREFACE Introduction to Civil Air Patrol has been written primarily for the new CAP member.
It is, however, available to the general public, and we hope that it will afford a better understanding of the goals of the humanitarian mission of Civil Air Patrol, the official auxiliary of the United States Air Force.
Acknowledgments Grateful appreciation is extended to Colonel Leonard Blascovich, CAP National Historian, for his contribution to the revision and editing of this pamphlet.
Also, appreciation is extended to Lieutenant Colonel Rober t Bettinson and Captain Barry Spink for their contributions and assistance.
Without their help, this revision would not have been possible.
Revised 2002 Table of Contents Introduction ......................................................................
..............................................
1 Chapter One ......................................................................
.............................................
3 Preparing for War ......................................................................
...................
3 1941 Realization of a National Civil Air Patrol .........................................
5 Early Days and Wartime Activities ..............................................................
6 Other Wartime Missions ......................................................................
.......
11 Pilot Training and the Cadet Program ........................................................
14 Rewards for Service ......................................................................
..............
15 The Postwar Period Search for New Roles ..............................................
15 Chapter Two ......................................................................
...........................................
19 The CAP-USAF Relationship .....................................................................
19 The United States Air Force ...................................................................... .
20 Organization of the Civil Air Patrol............................................................
24 The CAP Field Organization ......................................................................
28 Chapter Three ......................................................................
........................................
31 Membership Classifications ......................................................................
..
31 CAP Member Compensation, Hospitalization, and Insurance ....................
33 Civil Air Patrol Publications ...................................................................... .
33 Chapter Four ......................................................................
..........................................
37 Administration of Civil Air Patrol Mission Activities ................................
38 CAP Emergency Services ......................................................................
.....
39 Aerospace Education ......................................................................
............
45 The Cadet Program ......................................................................
...............
46 CAP and Other Organizations ....................................................................
48 Conclusion ......................................................................
............................
49 i Introduction "
To serve America by developing our Nation's youth; accomplishing local, state and national emergency and humanitarian missions; and educating our citizens on the impact of aviation and space."
--CAP Mission Statement CAP's mission statement symbolizes who we are and why we exist.
These are the essential jobs which we have been tasked to perform for America.
What does it mean? Civil Air Patrol has been at the forefront of community service for six decades in times of war and peace its members giving far more than they could hope to receive in return.
CAP's members do this for love of country, respect for their fellow man, and their need to contribute to their communities.
CAP performs no warfighting function, it is the benevolent auxiliary of the United States Air Force, performing essential non-combatant missions for the Air Force in time of need; as embodied in our mission statement.
This relationship with the uniformed services, and the Air Force in particular, is at the heart of CAP's existence, as it has been almost since its inception.
CAP was founded on 1 December 1941, just six days before Pearl Harbor.
The mood of the country was one of uncertainty.
The world at that time was in a frantic and uncontrollable state of change.
The European, Asian, and African continents were consumed by conflict: new conflicts using weapons borne of advanced technologies including the airplane.
These weapons could deliver unimagined levels of destruction not only to the battlefield, but also to civilian populations hundreds of miles away from the battlefield.
It changed the face and consciousness of warfare.
Most disturbingly for America, its citizens could not know for sure that just six days after CAP's founding their country would be mired in this new kind of war.
It could not yet see the work, sacrifice, setbacks and comebacks which would be the building blocks of the Allied triumph in World War II or the unforgettable role America and Civil Air Patrol - would play in that triumph.
CAP's efforts would defend America's shores and borders, train soldiers and airmen, rescue hundreds of men and women, and help to mold a new generation of Americans during those years.
Its ultimate reward for service was the opportunity to make the same kind of difference in peacetime as the auxiliary of the nation's newest armed service: The United States Air Force.
And, for the past 60 years, this is what Civil Air Patrol has done.
Its three-fold mission of Emergency Services, Aerospace Education and the Cadet Program is CAP's defining triad, dedicated to serving the American people through education, welfare and personal development services.
As 1 technological and societal needs change the nature of what CAP is asked to do, it adapts to meet those needs.
Civil Air Patrol's resources are almost unparalleled by any other civilian search and rescue organization in the world today, boasting America's largest privately owned fleet of single engine aircraft and the world's largest privately-owned short-wave radio network.
These, along with countless privately owned ground vehicles and nearly 60,000 members of all ages, provide a blanket of coverage spanning all 50 states, the District of Columbia, and Puerto Rico.
There are also CAP units attached to US military installations overseas, providing CAP's cadet program to military family members around the world.
This pamphlet will tell you how Civil Air Patrol was founded, how it established its reputation for outstanding public service, what it is today, and what it means to you as a new CAP member.
It will explain and give you an appreciation of both the mission statement you read at the beginning of this introduction, but also the vision which CAP holds for its members-- "Civil Air Patrol, America's Air Force Auxiliary, building the Nation's finest force of citizen volunteers--performing Missions for America."
--CAP Vision 2 Chapter One Civil Air Patrol's Inception Preparing for War Civil Air Patrol began as an idea by aviation enthusiasts and pilots who the future of general aviation in America in the years before World War II.
In Nazi Germany, Fascist Italy, and Imperial Japan created an alliance called the over much of Europe, North Africa and Indochina.
Their actions were America's allies and vital interests.
were concerned about the mid to late 1930's, Axis, and were taking beginning to threaten A by-product of the Axis' aggressions was the stifling of civil aviation in conquered countries.
Also, in those countries not yet threatened by Axis power, civil aircraft flight was either drastically curtailed or eliminated as authorities realized the need to better control air traffic through restriction to military flights only.
During the period 1938-41, United States civilian aircraft pilots, aviation mechanics and aviation enthusiasts became increasingly concerned about the international situation.
They began to understand as many Americans did that if the Axis powers were even marginally successful in their plans for conquests, America would be forced to intervene.
If so, they concluded that the government would most probably severely limit aviation in an attempt to reduce the risk of sabotage.
These air-minded Americans realized that the United States and the aviation community would be better suited if civil aviation could be put to use when hostilities opened instead of being restricted by the government.
During that period, there were approximately 25,000 light aircraft, 128,000 certified pilots, and over 14,000 aircraft mechanics in America.
Fearing these repercussions, many of these aviation enthusiasts searched for ways to both serve their country and preserve civil aviation's strength.
While many pilots and mechanics entered the Royal Air Force or the Royal Canadian Air Force to "get on with it," others joined the US armed services.
Those who could not join a military service because of age, physical condition or for other reasons still had the desire to help.
They were prepared to endorse any plan whereby they and their aircraft could be put to use when the time came in defense of the nation.
The concept of a national civil air patrol was first envisaged in 1938 when Mr. Gill Robb Wilson, a noted aviation writer of the time, returned from a writing assignment in Germany.
While there, he noticed Germany's aggressive intentions first-hand.
Upon his return to his home state of New Jersey, he reported his findings to Governor Edison and pleaded that New Jersey organize and use its civil air fleet as an augmentive force for the war that he was convinced would come.
3 Governor Edison approved the concept and Mr. Wilson formulated a plan to consolidate general aviation into a public service organization devoted to supporting America's war effort.
In this way, private pilots could use their skills to help defend their country; and stay in the air! This plan, backed by the Chief of the Army Air Corps, General Henry H. "Hap" Arnold and the Civil Aeronautics Authority, called for the utilization of single-engine, propeller-driven aircraft for liaison work and patrolling uninhabited stretches of coastline and vital infrastructure such as dams, aqueducts, pipelines, etc., to guard against sabotage.
In addition, security measures, such as policing the airports and fingerprinting those people associated with light aviation, were to be performed by Civil Air Defense Services personnel (as Wilson's organization in New Jersey was named).
Other efforts were made following the pattern of the New Jersey Civil Air Defense Services.
The Airplane Owners and Pilots Association (a Did you know? national organization that still exists today) had its "Civil Air Guard" units in several metropolitan The Civil Air Patrol National cities across the nation.
The Civil Air Guard was Headquarters building is named Wilson started by Mr. Milton Knight in Ohio.
In time, Hall in honor of CAP's founder, Gill other states followed the pioneering efforts of Robb Wilson.
New Jersey.
Colorado and Missouri had state air squadrons; Florida formed an organization known Mr. Wilson is honored further by having as the "Florida Defense Force."
Soon states from CAP's highest award for senior member across America had their own organizations.
But professional development named after of all these organizations, it was Gill Robb him.
Wilson's Civil Air Defense Service that was the Finally, Mr. Wilson was inducted into the blueprint for Civil Air Patrol.
Civil Air Patrol Hall of Honor, the highest award CAP can bestow to a member.
Meanwhile, the US Army Air Corps and the Civil Aeronautics Administration had instituted what it saw as a first step towards utilizing civil air strength, by formulating a civilian pilot refresher course and a civilian pilot training program.
But these two activities made provision only for military use of those trained, with the objective of raising the existing reservoir of civilian airmen who could be placed into military service when needed.
However, there were still many civilian pilots who were not deemed as acceptable for this step.
4 The second step pertained to the civil air strength in being.
The program's objective was to organize civilian aviation personnel so that their efforts could best be used in what loomed on the horizon as an all-out war effort.
It was from this second step that Civil Air Patrol came into being.
As with any program of such magnitude, there were varying opinions, and much thought and effort were spent before a workable program could be devised.
Some highly responsible men believed military use should be made of civilian "know-how."
Others, equally responsible, believed that civil aviation should be curtailed in time of war, as in Europe.
Divergent viewpoints concerning control arose even among those who advocated military use of civilian aircraft.
One group was convinced that light-plane aviation interests should be unified under a national system, while another group believed that control would be more appropriate at the state level.
1941 Realization of a National Civil Air Patrol The advocates of a nationwide Civil Air Patrol made innumerable contacts in their effort to establish their proposed organization as an element of America's defense.
But first, the problem of how to best use Civil Air Patrol for military missions had to be solved through Federal government approval and direction.
Preparation On 22 April 1941, Mr. Thomas H. Beck, Chairman of the Board of the Crowell-Collier Publishing Co., prepared and presented to President Franklin D. Roosevelt a plan for the mobilization of the nation's air strength.
Mr. Beck discussed his plan with Mr. Guy P. Gannett, owner of a New England newspaper chain.
On 20 May 1941, the Office of Civilian Defense (OSD) was established as an agency of the Federal government with former mayor of New York City, Fiorello H. LaGuardia, as its director.
National Civil Air Patrol advocates, including Mr. Wilson, Mr. Beck, and Mr. Gannett, presented their plan for a national level CAP to Mr. LaGuardia.
Having been a pilot during World War I (WW I), LaGuardia saw merit in the plan and expressed his enthusiasm for it, but he also recognized that its success would hinge upon the support of the War Department, specifically the US Army Air Corps.
Did you know? The Civil Air Patrol 3-bladed propeller emblem was actually taken from the Civil Defense Emblem.
Look closely, and you'll see that the CAP emblem has the same blue circle, white triangle, and red letter/symbol insert.
Mr. LaGuardia appointed Wilson, Beck, and Gannett to a special aviation committee with instructions to "blueprint" the organization of national aviation resources on a national scale.
By June 1941, a plan for the proposed organization took shape, although many of the details still needed to be worked out.
Gill Robb Wilson accomplished this task, assisted by Mr. Reed Landis, a WW I ace, aeronautical expert, and the OSD aviation consultant.
Wilson and Landis had the advice and assistance of some of the country's leading airmen as they worked to finalize the plan.
By early October the planning was completed, what was left was the drawing up of directives, design of basic forms, and a few other administrative details.
To see to these remaining details, and 5 to accomplish the important task of selecting wing commanders (one for each state), Wilson left his New York office and traveled to Washington DC, as the Civil Air Patrol's first executive officer.
Military Approval To solidify the plan under the approval of the military establishment, General "Hap" Arnold who had encouraged the plan from the beginning convened a board of military officers to review the final plan presented by Gill Robb Wilson and his colleagues.
General Arnold appointed General George E. Stratemeyer as presiding officer of the board, which included Colonel Harry H. Blee, Major Lucas P. Ordway, Jr., and Major A.B. McMullen.
General Arnold asked the board to determine the potential of the Civil Air Patrol plan and to evaluate the role of the War Department in making CAP an agency of the new Office of Civilian Defense.
The board approved the plan, while recommending that Army Air Forces (AAF) officers help to start up and administer the new organization.
Now with military approval, the Director of Civilian Defense (Mr. LaGuardia) signed the formal order creating the Civil Air Patrol on 1 December 1941.
Early Days and Wartime Activities On 8 December 1941, the day after the attack on Pearl Harbor by the Imperial Japanese Naval Air Forces, Director LaGuardia published a document called Administrative Order 9.
This order outlined the proposed organization of Civil Air Patrol and designated its first national commander Major General John F. Curry, US Army Air Corps.* Gill Robb Wilson officially became CAP's first executive officer.
Appointed as the operations officer of the fledgling organization was Colonel Harry H. Blee, who was a member of the board that approved the establishment of CAP.
It is also interesting to note that Colonel Blee was one of many retired military officers recalled to active duty during World War II to fill vacancies created by the rapidly expanding military establishment and wartime activities.
Under the wise leadership of these men and others like them, Civil Air Patrol began a period of tremendous growth and development in the service of our nation.
The fears of the civil aviation community that flight by civil aircraft would be halted when hostilities broke out were justified.
The day after the attack on Pearl Harbor all civil aircraft, except for scheduled commercial airlines, were grounded.
This restriction lasted only for a few days, except on the West Coast, where restrictions were maintained throughout the war due to concerns about Japanese activity in that area of the country.
The pendulum swung the other way in the rest of the country, and soon very little thought was given to the small aircraft as they took off and landed at airports all over America.
Earle E. Johnson, one of CAP's founders and later Commander of Civil Air Patrol, was disturbed by the renewed flights and the lack of security at airports.
He saw the great potential of light aircraft not only as a beneficial tool for law abiding citizens, but also as a highly effective weapon in the hands of saboteurs.
He saw the potential for light aircraft to wreak havoc with the nation's industrial complexes.
* The title National Commander was reserved for the Air Force until 1975, when the title was changed to Commander, CAP-USAF/Executive Director.
The title was again changed, to Senior Air Force Advisor, in 1995.
6 They could do this, he reasoned, by making night flights to drop bombs on war plants.
Remember, American soil had just been attacked from the air, so this was a real concern.
No doubt, saboteurs would have to make a concentrated and all-out effort to have a crippling effect, for after the first attempt security measures would be instituted.
But the psychological effect on the public would be staggering no matter how successful their attempt.
Johnson didn't want saboteurs to have the chance, and he took it upon himself to prove the vulnerability of industry.
At eleven P.M. one evening, Mr. Johnson took off in his own airplane from his farm airstrip near Cleveland, Ohio.
In the airplane he carried three small sandbags and flew towards a cluster of war plants on Cleveland's outskirts.
Flying at 500 feet, Johnson dropped sandbags on the roofs of three plants and returned to his airstrip apparently undetected or, if detected, dismissed as a threat just as quickly.
The next morning, Mr. Johnson notified the plant owners that they had been "bombed."
The CAA reacted by again halting all civilian flying until adequate security measures had been taken.
These measures were not limited to industrial plants.
Airports would be guarded; this meant that all pilots before they would be permitted to fly would have to prove they were loyal citizens of the United States.
All flights were to be for official business only and accomplished only under approved flight plans.
A by-product of the increased security was an increase in CAP's initial membership because CAP's flight activities were for official business, and there was always flying going on.
Along with the pilots came thousands of other patriotic citizens, many of whom possessed special skills.
These included radio operators, mechanics, doctors and nurses.
Even those who had no special skills contributed as well performing support functions as messengers, guards and drivers, or to perform other necessary duties required to ensure the proper accomplishment of local CAP activities.
CAP World War II Activities Soon after Congress declared war against the Axis (Germany, Italy and Japan), German submarines were operating in the American coastal waters along eastern and southeastern shorelines.
Beginning with the sinking of 11 Allied sea going vessels in January 1942, many of which were within sight of United States' Eastern and Gulf shores, the submarines (U-boats as they were known), were exacting a heavy toll.
The monthly shipping loss continued to rise through May 1942, with 52 ships sunk.
Then they gradually declined until September 1942 when only one ship was lost, and no others were sunk for the remainder of the year.
But the damage had been done: 204 vessels were lost.
This level of destruction not only seriously affected the supply of war materials being exported to troops fighting in Europe and Africa, but also cut into the nation's petroleum supplies.
Civil Air Patrol leaders urged the War Department to give their new organization a chance to help combat the submarine threat.
CAP faced initial opposition to the plan, as it was argued that their proposal was not feasible.
This was because of the perceived impracticality of sending such a young organization with undisciplined and untried members on critical and dangerous missions.
Meanwhile, the Navy was so thinly spread along the 1,200-mile sea frontier of the eastern and southeastern coasts that it could not effectively combat the raiding enemy submarines.
To compound the problem, the Army Air Forces had not had enough time to build up the number of aircraft to a point where they could cope with their regular missions as well as the submarine menace.
Consequently, the German U-boats continued their activities through the spring and 7 summer of 1942 at an alarming rate.
They were sinking ships practically at will; oil, debris, and bodies were being washed ashore at a horrifying rate.
Coastal Patrol Authorized The worsening submarine threat convinced military authorities that Civil Air Patrol should be used to combat the German U-boats.
By this time Gill Robb Wilson had been replaced as the CAP's executive officer by Captain Earle L. Johnson, US Army Air Forces (the same Johnson who "bombed" industrial plants in Ohio).
This change enabled Wilson to concentrate on the tremendous task of organizing a coastal patrol program within Civil Air Patrol.
This preparation culminated on 5 March 1942, when the Civil Air Patrol was authorized to conduct a 90-day "experimental" operation on coastal patrol at two locations along the eastern seaboard.
This gave CAP's volunteers a scant 90 days to prove themselves worthy of the trust placed in them that of national defense.
In a very real sense, the destiny of Civil Air Patrol as an organization rested on the shoulders of this small group of brave aircrews.
They succeeded; before the 3-month period was over, CAP's coastal patrol operations were authorized to expand, both in duration and territory.
It is interesting to note that this successful operation contributed to the decision to replace the National Commander, Major General Curry, with Captain Johnson.
He was subsequently promoted to Colonel and served as CAP's National Commander until his death.
Finally, in recognition of his role as the wartime leader of CAP, Johnson was promoted to Brigadier General posthumously.
The original idea of Coastal Patrol was to perform unarmed reconnaissance flights over the eastern coasts.
The aircrews, pilots and observers, were to keep in constant touch with their bases and notify AAF and Navy patrols in the area of U-boats CAP planes carrying bombs went out to sea as far as 150 miles.
when sighted.
They would remain in the area until relieved.
And, soon after the CAP Coastal Patrol experiment was authorized, the first three bases were established at Atlantic City, New Jersey; Rehoboth, Delaware, and Lantana, Florida.
As the program matured the network was expanded to 21 bases.
Honors for the first combat flight by civilian pilots go to those of Coastal Patrol Base 2 at Rehoboth, Delaware.
Their 5 March 1942 patrol was less than one week after the 28 February 1942 activation date for the base.
Life was by no means easy at any of the coastal patrol bases and was extremely difficult at some.
For instance, a farmer's house and chicken coop were converted into a headquarters and barracks in Parkley, Virginia.
At this same base, the CAP members assigned had to cut down a grove of trees to make room for the runway.
The trees then had to be paid for by the members themselves! At the Manteo base in North Carolina, mosquitoes were so numerous that the members assigned there had to wear special head nets to protect themselves.
Another example was the coastal patrol members stationed at Grand Isle, Louisiana, where they had the dubious honor of living in an old and disheveled resort hotel with a rather large rat colony.
The member's compensation for their sacrifice? Only $8 per day for pilots and $5 per day for ground personnel.
Even under these austere conditions, membership in CAP rose at an astounding rate.
8 Why did these folks subject themselves to these primitive conditions with so little materially to gain? Their love of country and flying and their need to contribute to their country's defense.
And these people were from virtually every profession teachers, doctors, lawyers, plumbers, salesmen, and even a few millionaires.
As mentioned, the light aircraft flown by CAP coastal patrols were at first utilized for reconnaissance purposes only, and were not armed.
The aircrews spotted targets and reported back to their mission base.
They would then remain in the area until help arrived.
However in some cases, simply spotting enemy submarines would not be enough.
Late one afternoon in May 1942, a crew consisting of "Doc" Rinker and Tom Manning were flying a patrol mission just off Cape Canaveral when they spotted an enemy U-boat.
The U-boat crew, also sighting that CAP aircraft and not knowing that the craft was not armed, tried to escape and became stuck on a sandbar, thus making it a perfect target.
Rinker and Manning radioed the situation to the mission base, and circled the sub waiting for help.
For more than a half-hour the patrol kept circling and frantically calling for help, while the U-boat crew began to dislodge the their sub.
By the time bombers arrived to destroy the sub, it had dislodged itself and had escaped to deep waters.
Partly as a result of this event, CAP planes were fitted out with demolition bombs and depth charges while flying out as far as 150 miles from shore on their patrols.
Some of CAP's larger aircraft could carry 325 pound depth charges or an equal weight in bombs.
On the smaller aircraft, their bomb load was only 100 pounds, one small bomb.
In many instances the fins had to be removed from the bombs so they would fit underneath the wing of an aircraft not designed as a bomber.
So, even with the bombs modified, the smallest planes had difficulty taking off with The First "Kill" It was one of these larger planes armed with depth charges that made the first CAP "kill."
Captain Johnny Haggins and Major Wynant Farr, flying out of Atlantic City, New Jersey, had just become airborne in a Grumman Widgeon (an amphibian, a plane that can land on land or water) when they received a message from another CAP patrol that "contact" had been made about 25 miles off the coast.
The other patrol was low on fuel and was being forced to return to base, so Haggins and Farr sped to the area, while flying a scant 300 feet above the ocean.
When the Haggins-Farr patrol reached the area, no sub was in sight.
Very shortly thereafter however, Major Farr spotted the U-boat as it cruised beneath the surface of the waves.
After radioing to shore, and knowing that they could not accurately estimate the depth of the sub, the crew decided to follow the sub until (they hoped) it rose to periscope depth, when they would have a better chance of hitting the sub with their depth charges.
For over three hours they shadowed the U-boat and eventually ran low on fuel.
Just before they had to turn back, the U-boat rose back up to periscope depth.
Captain Haggins swung the plane around 9 Did you know? CAP aircraft flying coastal patrol against German submarines did not have military bombsights.
Existing bombsights were too cumbersome to carry aboard CAP's light aircraft.
In addition, they were classified and could not be given to CAP members.
To solve the problem, enterprising CAP members made their own, the most interesting of which was out of a soup can, straight pins, and a piece of string.
the additional load.
quickly and aligned it with the sub.
He then began a gentle dive to 100 feet where he leveled off behind the sub's periscope wake.
Major Farr pulled the cable release and the first depth charge plummeted into the water just off the sub's bow.
Seconds later a large water and oil geyser erupted, the explosion literally blowing the sub's forward portion out of the water.
Shock waves from the blast rocked the patrol plane.
As the sub sank below the surface, it left a huge oil slick as the target for the second run.
On the second run, the remaining depth charge was dropped squarely in the middle of the oil slick.
After the second geyser had settled, pieces of debris began to float to the surface.
The CAP Coastal Patrol's first kill was confirmed! As a result of its effectiveness, the CAP Coastal Patrol passed its experimental or trial period with "flying" colors.
The coastal patrol went on to serve its country for nearly 18 months (5 March 1942 31 August 1943), flying in good weather and bad, from dawn to dusk.
The 18-month record of the Coastal Patrol all volunteer civilians, with little or no formal combat training is most impressive: it began with three bases and was operating from 21 bases at the conclusion of the program.
It had reported 173 U-boats sighted, sunk two, and had dropped a total of 83 bombs and depth charges upon 57 of these with several other "probables."
Its aircrews flew 86,865 missions over coastal waters for a total of 244,600 hours which approximates to 24 million miles! The patrols summoned help for 91 ships in distress and for 363 survivors of submarine attacks.
It sighted and reported 17 floating mines, and, at the request of the US Navy, flew 5,684 special convoy missions.
CAP Coastal Patrol's impressive record, however, was not without cost.
Twenty-six CAP aircrew members were killed, and seven were seriously injured on these missions.
Of the aircraft, 90 were lost.
But the impressive amassment of mission feats brought official recognition to many of the Patrol's members.
They were winners of Air Medals and War Department Awards for "Exceptional Civilian Service."
These were merely tokens of the high esteem bestowed by a government representing a nation of grateful people.
Did you know? CAP members received the first two Air Medals (given for valor in aerial flight) ever awarded by the United States.
Major Hugh Sharp and Lieutenant Eddie Edwards received the medals in mid-1942 for rescuing CAP Lt. Henry Cross, who crashed into the sea while on coastal patrol.
Not every encounter that CAP had was with submarines, and humor managed to creep into some missions, though those involved may not have seen These medals were awarded by the humor in the situations at the time.
For example, President Franklin Roosevelt, in the at the Brownsville, Texas base, escort patrols for Oval Office of the White House.
incoming and outgoing shipping were being flown by CAP members.
One morning the base commander, Ben McGlashan, and the assistant base commander Henry King (who was also the director of 20th Century Fox studios), flew escort for a convoy out in the Gulf of Mexico.
While in civilian clothes and flying out over the Gulf, the two ran into strong headwinds which caused more fuel to be used than had been expected.
Realizing their fuel consumption would prevent returning to Brownsville, they realized that they would have to land in Mexico.
Immediately upon landing in Mexico, they were immediately arrested by the Mexican authorities.
They protested loudly, but the fact that they were dressed in civilian clothes did not help to convince the authorities that they were not spies of some sort.
It was only after lengthy hand-waving communications between themselves and the authorities, with the help of three Mexican pilots they had 10 encountered while flying their missions that they were permitted to refuel and leave Mexican territory thankfully without creating a diplomatic or military incident.
Soon after this incident Mexico granted CAP permission to land it planes in its territory in special situations.
Other Wartime Missions Although the Coastal Patrol program was discontinued in 31 August 1943, it did not signal any loss of confidence in Civil Air Patrol.
Its mission had been accomplished in that the regular forces had been built up to the point where they could take over the CAP's former coastal patrol mission.
In fact, CAP continued pursuing its other wartime missions, most of which had been going on at the same time as the Coastal Patrol was operating.
Many of the other wartime missions conducted by Civil Air Patrol were just as important and equally dramatic as those flights made as those of the Coastal Patrol.
These missions became the foundation of CAP operations today.
To fulfill these other missions, CAP flew approximately 500,000 hours and lost 30 pilots due to accidental deaths while many other pilots were injured.
Both men and women took part in these wartime missions (women were excluded from Coastal Patrol flights).
They joined CAP for periods ranging from 30 days to the duration of the war, and flew their missions for subsistence pay only.
Although they were reimbursed for expenses incurred while on assigned missions, the $8 or $5 per day did not contribute much to their support or the support of their families and many members were separated from their families.
In addition, many members flew without pay on unassigned but necessary missions.
They spent thousands of dollars out of their own pockets in the service of their country.
Search and Rescue During the period 1 January 1942 to 1 January 1946, Civil Air Patrol flew 24,000 hours of assigned search and rescue (SAR) missions.
During the same period, CAP aircrews voluntarily flew thousands of additional SAR hours at their own expense.
Although no accurate record was kept of the number of aircraft and survivors found, one week in February 1945 was probably the highlight of SAR missions.
In this single week, CAP SAR crews found seven missing Army and Navy planes.
CAP search and rescue pilots had three advantages over AAF search and rescue pilots, and as a consequence, CAP had a greater percentage of "finds."
First, the CAP aircraft could fly much lower and slower than AAF airplanes because of their design.
Second, the CAP pilots were more familiar with the terrain in their search sectors and could spot wreckage that would be concealed from pilots unfamiliar with the same territory.
Finally, CAP ground teams were ready to speed to the sites where wreckage was thought to be, using a variety of means, including foot travel.
CAP ground teams in fact had an interesting variety ofways to get around.
Ground search team on foot spots wreckage of plane.
11 In Nevada, ground search teams adopted horses as their mode of transportation over the rough mountainous terrain.
They rigged litters to special pack horses and brought many victims back to civilization.
The "mounties" sometimes ran out of water on long treks over arid countryside, and came up with an ingenious solution.
Instead of sending back to their base for water, CAP pilots would parachute packs of ice to them.
The ground teams would simply place the ice in containers to melt, and this provided them with a fresh water supply.
In Florida, where the late Zack Mosely, the famous cartoonist and creator of "Smiling Jack" was wing commander, special vehicles known as "glade buggies" were used for ground rescue missions.
The glade buggy was a shallow draft vessel with what amounted as a fan attached to the stern for propulsion, and were particularly adept at traversing swamps.
These buggies were very useful for rescuing downed pilots in areas no other vehicle could go.
Ground teams in "snow country" employed skis as a means of travel.
In Washington state, a parachute unit was formed to "drop" into areas that were inaccessible by other means.
Though the parachutists were never used, the tenacity and dedication showed by the CAP members in developing the idea showed their commitment to the cause.
Cargo and Courier Flying Cargo and courier flying was also an important mission during CAP's war years.
From 1942 through early 1944, CAP pilots moved 3.5 million pounds of mail and cargo for the Army Air Forces, and it transported hundreds of military passengers throughout the United States.
As wartime industrial production grew, the commercial and military transportation facilities became taxed to the limit of their capabilities.
They simply could not transport all of the war materials that were stacking up like mountains in the warehouses and supply depot yards.
CAP again provided the needed stop - gap solution to the transportation problem until the bottleneck could be relieved.
CAP conducted cargo and courier flights during WW II.
In the spring of 1942, Pennsylvania Wing pilots conducted a 30-day experiment to see if they could do the job of cargo transportation.
With only five light planes at their disposal, they transported Army cargo successfully over a large area, flying to AAF bases as far away as Georgia.
It wasn't long before industry and Army officials were convinced of CAP's potential in the cargo business, and gave CAP the go-ahead.
Soon thereafter, CAP set up regularly scheduled cargo flights and courier flights across the nation.
As a result of their cargo services, reduced air transportation costs were realized, and many military aircraft were eventually released for more direct employment in the war effort.
Border Patrol Civil Air Patrol was active in patrolling the border between Brownsville, Texas, and Douglas Arizona.
The CAP Southern Liaison Patrol flew approximately 30,000 hours, flying from dawn till dusk across the 1,000 miles of rough, rocky and barren terrain separating the United States and Mexico.
CAP aircrews looked for out-of-the-ordinary activities indicative of spies or saboteurs entering or leaving the 12 country.
Aircrews often flew their aircraft low enough to read the license plates on suspicious automobiles.
When one car was stopped at the Mexican border, it was found to be carrying enemy agents.
In another case, a patrol noticed car tracks leading to what was thought to be an abandoned building.
Investigation by ground units revealed an enemy radio station.
From its beginning in July 1942 to its discontinuance in April 1944, the CAP "Border Patrol" had reported almost 7,000 out of the ordinary activities on the ground within its patrol area and radioed to the AAF the description and direction of flight of 176 suspicious aircraft.
Considering is many hours of hazardous operations, the loss of only two members was an exceptional safety record.
Target Towing and Other Missions In March 1942, CAP units began towing targets for air-to-air and ground-to-air gunnery practice by fighter aircraft and anti-aircraft batteries.
They would fly antiaircraft machine gun runs simulating a strafing attack, trailing targets as close as 1,000 feet behind them.
They would then climb to high altitudes trailing two targets at distances of up to 5,000 feet.
These were used for heavy antiaircraft guns to practice on; and, occasionally, the CAP plane towing the target would be hit with an errant antiaircraft round.
One pilot was even reported to have found a shell fragment embedded in his parachute seat-pack! One of the other notable services CAP rendered to the people manning antiaircraft batteries was flying night missions to provide tracking practice for the crews of searchlight and radar units.
Though CAP pilots were not under fire, these missions were dangerous.
There was always a possibility that an airplane pilot would inadvertently look into the glare of a searchlight, become blinded, and lose control of his aircraft.
To illustrate the danger, we remember the story of Captain Raoul Souliere, an experienced pilot from Biddeford, Maine.
One ink-black night just off the coast of Portsmouth, New Hampshire, Captain Souliere began his searchlight run in the normal manner.
The searchlight found him and seemed to pin him against the night sky, the searchlight never losing his airplane.
For a few moments Souliere remained on his original course, but soon he initiated evasive maneuvers in an attempt to escape the lights.
But no matter what he tried, the searchlight operators kept him squarely in the lights.
For several more minutes this battle of wits ensued between the pilot and searchlight operators, until his aircraft went into a steep dive from which there appeared to be no effort to recover.
Witnesses surmised that Captain Souliere became disoriented when he accidentally looked into the intense searchlight beams that were targeting his aircraft.
This happened during his evasive maneuvers and he became disoriented and did not realize that his aircraft was in a dive.
While events like this one did occur (7 CAP members killed, 5 seriously injured, and 23 aircraft lost) they were clearly the exception, and not the norm.
For three years CAP flew these hazardous missions, helping to increase the efficiency of Army units preparing for combat.
CAP flew a total of 20,593 towing and tracking missions 46,000 hours were flown on live ammunition and searchlight tracking missions.
At the same time, other CAP pilots and crews flew missions assisting the war effort directly or indirectly.
Among these were: flying blood bank mercy missions for the American Red Cross and other civilian agencies; cruising over forests, detecting fires and reporting suspected arsonists; flying mock raids to test blackout practices and air raid warning systems; supporting bond drives, and assisting in salvage collection drives.
CAP pilots were even pressed into service as a "wolf patrol."
The population of wolves had increased to dangerous proportions in the southwest.
By the winter of 1944, ranchers in the Texas 13 panhandle called upon their governor to enlist the aid of Civil Air Patrol to help control the wolf menace.
One rancher alone lost over 1,000 head of cattle to marauding wolves the year before; especially significant because beef was already in short supply due to wartime rationing of many foodstuffs.
CAP pilots armed with various firearms took to the air and thinned the wolf population back to manageable levels.
Not all of CAP's wartime activities were in the air.
We have already mentioned ground teams in support of search and rescue.
CAP members also guarded airfields and other installations; patrolled power lines and waterways, protecting against saboteurs.
When natural disasters occurred, CAP assisted the Red Cross and other agencies evacuate people and administer aid wherever they were needed.
Pilot Training and the Cadet Program Throughout the war, Civil Air Patrol carried out another important mission pilot training.
In early 1942 it had planned a program to recruit and train a youth program with an emphasis on flight training.
CAP cadets, as they were called, assisted with tasks at the operational level, and, at the same time, began indoctrination and training toward becoming licensed pilots for service in CAP or enter military service for military flight training.
This program kicked off in Minnesota in October 1942.
CAP was organized along military lines.
Its members wore uniforms, operated in a military manner and performed defense functions, and none of its physically-fit members were exempt from military service; they could be inducted (drafted) into the military at any time.
Cadets who joined CAP had a distinct advantage however, in that he or she (although women were not drafted) would already have a knowledge of military life and of aviation's challenge and importance to the nation.
The pilot training program built a reserve of air-minded citizens from whom the military air forces could draw needed personnel, particularly those CAP members who had completed private pilot training.
Did you know? The first cadets to serve in Civil Air Patrol came from Minneapolis Central High School.
At its inception, the unit had 39 cadets.
Within six months of the Cadet Program's inception, over 20,000 youth had joined across the country.
The cost for starting the cadet program? Less than $200.
Each male adult member of CAP could sponsor one boy, and each female member could sponsor one girl, between the ages of 15 and 17.
Cadets had to be physically fit, have completed the first two years of high school, maintain satisfactory grades, and be a native-born American citizen of parents who had been citizens of the United States for at least 10 years.
Indeed these restrictions seem rather severe; but they were intentionally imposed to hold down membership levels in the program until a solid foundation could be established.
Restrictions notwithstanding, American youth responded beyond anyone's expectations.
Within just six months of the program's beginning, over 20,000 cadets attended weekly meetings in classrooms and other meeting places, studied in groups, on their own, or side by side with their senior member counterparts.
The cadets spent many or all of their weekends at local airports applying what they had learned in the classroom.
Surprisingly, recruiting 20,000-plus CAP cadets only cost the Office of Civilian Defense slightly less than $200, spent solely on administrative costs.
14 Rewards for Service CAP's performance of its wartime missions and success with the Cadet Program resulted in Department envisioning a permanent place for CAP in its establishment.
So, on 29 April 1943 of President Franklin Roosevelt, command of the CAP was transferred from the Office of Defense to the War Department and given status as the auxiliary to the US Army Air Forces banner day for all those who worked to make CAP the success it had become.
the War by order Civilian truly a Just a few days later, on 4 May 1943, the War Department issued Memorandum W95-12-43, assigning to the Army Air Forces the responsibility for supervising and directing operations of the Civil Air Patrol.
One of the more significant outcomes of this transfer of command jurisdiction was its impact on CAP's Cadet recruiting mission Army aviation cadets, that is.
By this time, CAP had built up its membership to about 75,000 men and women located in over 1,000 communities across America.
Moreover, the early wartime practice of training CAP members for operational missions had established an effective training corps ready to assume a larger Army aviation cadet training mission.
By December 1943, the Army Air Forces loaned 288 L-4 aircraft (civilian designated as the, "Piper Grasshopper") to Civil Air Patrol for use in the aviation cadet recruiting program.
CAP "took to the air," and during 1944 flew 78,000 aviation cadets and prospective recruits for a total of 41,000 flying hours.
Before the end of 1944, CAP had recruited an oversupply of cadets, and took over the responsibility of administering cadet mental screening tests and operating centers where cadets received preliminary medical evaluations.
The record established by CAP during the war years impressed the nation.
It flew 500,000 hours of missions in support of the war effort; sunk two German U-boats; and saved countless lives airplane crash survivors and survivors of disasters at sea by efficiently directing rescue forces to them.
Members spent innumerable amounts of their own money in support of wartime missions, and volunteered thousands of hours of non-flying mission time to train or indoctrinate cadets.
They had built their own airfields and pitched in to help when natural disasters occurred.
No sacrifice was too great for these selfless men and women and ultimately 57 members paid for it with their lives.
The Postwar Period Search for New Roles The Civil Air Patrol was still serving as an auxiliary of the Army Air Forces at the cessation of hostilities in 1945, but this status, established by executive order, had no foundation by statute.
It was not law.
Its usefulness had been proven in wartime, but peace dramatically reduced CAP's scope of activities because the Army Air Forces now assumed many of the tasks assigned to CAP during the war, and many other tasks were eliminated.
To worsen the situation, the AAF withdrew its monetary support of the program after 31 March 1946, due to drastic budget cuts.
This made Civil Air Patrol's future very uncertain.
In light of these circumstances, General "Hap" Arnold called a conference of CAP wing commanders.
In January 1946 the conference convened and discussed the feasibility of a postwar Civil Air Patrol.
From this conference, a plan to incorporate was born.
15 On the evening of 1 March 1946, the (then) 48 wing commanders held their first congressional dinner, honoring President Harry S. Truman, the 79th Congress of the United States, and over 50 AAF general officers.
The keynote speaker was General Carl A. Spaatz, who later became the first Chief of Staff of the USAF.
The express purpose of the dinner was to permit CAP to thank the President and the other honorees for the opportunity to serve America during World War II.
Civil Air Patrol Incorporated On 1 July 1946, Public Law 476, 79th Congress, 2nd Session, was signed into law.
It incorporated the Civil Air Patrol and authorized the incorporators named therein to complete the organization of the corporation by the adoption of a constitution and by-laws and regulations, and by the selection of corporate officers, etc.
The law stated that the objects and purposes of the corporation were to be "solely of a benevolent character."
Simply stated, Civil Air Patrol would never again participate in combat operations.
The objects and purposes stated: v To provide an organization to encourage and aid American citizens in the contribution of their efforts, services, and resources in the development of aviation and in the maintenance of air supremacy, and to encourage and develop by example the voluntary contribution of private citizens to the public welfare; v To provide aviation education and training especially to the senior and cadet members; to encourage and foster civil aviation in local communities and to provide an organization of private citizens with adequate facilities to assist in meeting local and national facilities.
Under this Federal charter the CAP Corporation planned to undertake a very ambitious program at this time without the help of the Army Air Forces.
Among the first-defined CAP objectives were to: v Inform the general public about aviation and its impacts v Provide its seniors and cadets ground and preflight aviation education and training v Provide air service under emergency conditions v Establish a radio network covering all parts of the United States for both training and emergency use v Encourage the establishment of flying clubs for it's membership v Provide selected cadets a two-week encampment at air bases 16 v Provide selected cadets flight scholarships v Encourage model airplane building and flying v Assist veterans to find employment; and, v Contribute services to special projects such as airport development, the survey and marking of emergency landing areas, and the survey of dangerous flying areas in mountainous areas.
In addition to implementing the objectives of the first program, the newly chartered Civil Air Patrol undertook other official and unofficial tasks when requested by the Army Air Forces.
These included helping to prepare an address list of all former AAF personnel, helping convince the public of the merits and need for an autonomous air force, assisting in the air marking program (identifying downed aircraft debris to avoid its being mistaken as a new crash), and conducting AAF-CAP air shows.
Obviously, many of CAP's objectives could not have been attained without the support of the Army Air Forces.
However, since there was no official basis for this support, it appeared necessary to review the true relationship between the Army Air Forces and Civil Air Patrol.
After the United States Air Force (USAF) had been established (26 July 1947), steps were taken to study the USAFCAP relationship.
Permanent Status as the USAF Auxiliary In October 1947, a special CAP board convened to meet with USAF officials and plan the establishment of the Civil Air Patrol as the USAF auxiliary.
After several meetings between CAP and USAF officials, certain agreements were reached concerning CAP and USAF objectives; and a plan was adopted to legalize US Air Force assistance to Civil Air Patrol.
Shortly thereafter, a bill introduced in the US House of Representatives permanently established CAP as the official auxiliary of the US Air Force and authorized the Secretary of the Air Force to extend aid to CAP.
On 26 May 1948, this legislation became Public Law CAP's 557 (10 USC 9441), 80th Congress, Second Session.
CAP thus became the official auxiliary to the new United States Air Force.
original legal foundations.
In the years since, CAP has traveled throughout the Air Force organization.
It was first assigned to Headquarters, USAF, then moved on 1 January 1959 to Continental Air Command.
The reason for the Did you know? transfer was CAP's more comfortable fit into the Air Force organization.
When Continental Air Command Civil Air Patrol National Headquarters was inactivated on 1 July 1968, CAP transferred to moved to Maxwell AFB, Alabama from Headquarters Command, USAF.
CAP remained there Ellington AFB, Texas in 1967.
until 1976, when it moved again, this time to Air University then a major command in its own right and now an arm of Air Education and Training Command.
17 An important distinction is made here.
Each assignment within the Air Force organization pertained only to the active duty, reserve, and civilian members of the Air Force.
The volunteers retained their own chain of command within the Civil Air Patrol structure.
18 Chapter Two The CAP-USAF Relationship and the Organization of Civil Air Patrol The CAP-USAF Relationship The Civil which is based the nation and services are to Air Patrol and the United States Air Force maintain a civilian-military relationship upon the Civil Air Patrol's status as the USAF Auxiliary.
As such, CAP's services to the USAF are: (1) voluntary, (2) benevolent, and (3) noncombatant.
Finally, these be employed both in times of peace and war.
It is the responsibility of the US Air Force to provide technical information and advice to those CAP members who organize, train and direct CAP members and who develop CAP resources.
In CAP-USAF lingo, this is called advice, liaison, and oversight.
We'll discuss these terms later.
In addition to these functions, the Air Force also makes available certain services and facilities required by CAP to carry out its mission.
Such assistance, however, is restricted to specific areas by act of Congress, and cannot interfere or conflict with the performance of the Air Force mission.
Finally, in part because of its relationship to the Air Force, the government provides some level of protection to CAP members and their families in the event a member is killed or injured while participating in a qualifying Air Force sponsored mission.
In return,
Civil Air Patrol assists the Air Force through the performance of its three faceted mission: Emergency Services, Aerospace Education, and the Cadet Program.
Emergency Services (ES) may be CAP's best known of the three-faceted mission; itself having several components.
Since 1948, the Air Force controls the in-land search and rescue (SAR) activities within the United States.
CAP's role in this mission provides the bulk of the operational SAR services, primarily through flying and ground team activities.
CAP's personnel and aircraft fly thousands of hours each year flying SAR missions, as well as mercy flights and disaster relief assistance.
In addition, CAP's ES activities also include performing civil defense activities and other missions, such as: crashed aircraft spotting and marking, route surveys, counterdrug reconnaissance, 19 courier services, light transport duty, post-attack recovery duty, and similar activities within the capabilities of CAP light aircraft and other equipment.
Civil Air Patrol also maintains a nation-wide radio network.
It is used for domestic or military emergencies, CAP activities of all types, search and rescue support, and training communications personnel.
The CAP Chaplain Service provides over 700 chaplains and moral leadership officers.
Serving in squadrons, they teach the moral leadership cadet curriculum while providing spiritual assistance to all unit personnel.
Many chaplains are also pilots, while others are involved in search and rescue teams and emergency services.
Under Title 10, CAP Chaplain Service personnel can be called upon by the Air force to perform certain USAF chaplain functions.
One other area of valuable assistance given to the Air Force and other Federal agencies is the CAP Aerospace Education Program.
Through its "internal" program of aerospace education given to both cadet and senior members, and the "external" aerospace education services to schools, colleges and the general public (through workshops, conferences and a variety of free materials), the knowledge, skills, and attitudes necessary for living successfully in the aerospace age are imparted, not only to CAP members, but to educators, students and, most importantly, to the general public.
To help present and carry out the aerospace education program, CAP develops lesson plans, videos, and other educational materials.
CAP also encourages and helps to plan guided tours of aerospace-related facilities such as airports, Air Force bases and aerospace manufacturing facilities.
All these things help to instill in the American people an appreciation of the importance of what the Air Force does, how the aerospace industry contributes to American society on a daily basis, and how everyday people can get more involved.
Finally, a most important example of CAP's reciprocal service to the Air Force is found in the number of CAP cadets and senior members who have become officers and airmen in the United States Air Force.
Every year, thousands of CAP cadets and former cadets enter the Air Force Academy, other service academies, Reserve Officer Training Corps programs at colleges and universities across the country, and basic training programs of all services.
To better understand the relationship that the Civil Air Patrol and the US Air Force enjoys, and to see how these organizations work together to serve our nation, are considered separately.
First, a review of the United States Air Force history, mission, and organization.
The United States Air Force Just as you have learned about the evolution of Civil Air Patrol, it's also important to learn about the evolution of CAP's parent service, the USAF.
Before we discuss CAP's organization, we'll talk a little bit about the Air Force.
Evolution of the US Air Force The US Air Force has grown rapidly and changed its name several times since its beginning on 1 August 1907.
Even though the Wright Brothers had made their first powered aircraft flight over three years earlier, that first `air force' was only equipped with three balloons to be manned and flown by only one officer and two enlisted men.
This organization was known as the Aeronautical 20 Division of the Army Signal Corps.
In 1909, the Aeronautical Division received one airplane, built by the Wright Brothers, and was named the "Wright Flyer."
For its era, the airplane had an astounding top speed 42.5 mph not so fast by today's standards, but fast enough when one considers that most people were, at that time, traveling either on foot or by horse and buggy.
On 26 October 1909, after receiving about three hours of `pilot training' from Wilbur Wright, Lt. F.E. Humphries was the first US Army officer to solo fly the Army's first airplane.
The first name change occurred in 1914 when the Aeronautical Division was changed to the Aviation Section still a part of the Army Signal Corps.
Four years later, when a large portion of the world was embroiled in World War I, the name was changed again to the Army Air Service.
It was also at this time that it separated from the Signal Corps and was placed under a newly created department in the Army known as the Department of Aeronautics.
The name changed yet again in 1926.
It then became the Army Air Corps and was headed by its chief, Major General M.M. Patrick.
With each name change came increased independence and authority within the Army chain of command, though it was not a separate service and did not yet really enjoy an equal relationship with the Army's other primary branches, such as the Infantry, Cavalry, or Artillery.
Its struggle for independence and technological advancement was hampered by anti-military sentiment after WW I. Right after the close of WW I, the American people had an aversion to all that was military.
An isolationist country since its inception, America as a people wanted to return to peaceful normalcy as soon as possible.
Bombers, and many fighter planes which helped to win the war, were stacked into heaps and burned; the huge army was practically disbanded overnight.
America was essentially demilitarizing itself.
From this chaos (as far as the airmen and other military men were concerned), the War and Navy Departments had to scramble for attention and monetary appropriations to carry out their programs.
The Army Air Corps had excellent attention-getters in the form of men with courage and airplanes; those who bravely voiced their beliefs and plans, and possessed the skill necessary to demonstrate exceptional flying.
While these efforts caused discomfort and competition among the services, and cost some airmen their careers; men like Brigadier General Billy Mitchell carried the verbal struggle from the ground and Jimmy Doolittle impressed both the American public and members of Congress with his record-shattering feats in the air.
These efforts were rewarded.
By 1935 the Army Air Corps had the men, the aircraft, the installations, and the know-how to begin building air power for the United States.
It was just in time.
By 1940 the United States was earnestly preparing for war, and President Roosevelt called for the production of 50,000 aircraft per year.
All of the excitement of war preparation also caused thought, planning, and new approaches to organizational structures, and the Army Air Corps benefited.
On 20 June 1941, the Army Air Forces (AAF) replaced the Army Air Corps, with its chief, General H.H. (Hap) Arnold reporting directly to the Army Chief of Staff.
When the United States entered the war, the AAF had a total of 10,000 aircraft, 22,000 officers, and 274,000 airmen.
Production continued throughout the war, and, despite losses, the AAF had over 70,000 aircraft, nearly 400,000 officers, and over 1,900,000 cadets and airmen at the war's end.
21 Within a year after the close of World War II, however, military forces were again deemphasized but not as drastically as it had been after WW I. Our experiences during the war taught us many lessons.
Our air war deterrent force was reduced to 30,000 aircraft capable of operation; slightly over 81,000 officers and a total of 373,782 cadets and enlisted men; of that only seven cadets! Despite the reduction of forces, the US still maintained a more credible force than it had before hostilities.
While the country still had isolationist tendencies, it realized it now had a leadership position in the world that it could not relinquish.
If America wanted to become the leader of the free world it must also be capable of defending it.
As a result and benefit of both the war and America's new found place on the world stage, the time was now right for the Army Air Forces to become a separate service.
On 26 July 1947, President Harry S. Truman signed the National Security Act.
The National Security Act formed the National Military Establishment under whose control came all military forces.
It also took the Army Air Forces from Army control and named it the United States Air Force with authority in the nation's defense equal to that of the Army and Navy.
The Air Force had only three years to plan and put into effect its new organizational structure, for its first combat trial was at hand in June 1950 when the Korean Conflict began.
Perform well it must, and perform well it did.
It flew air combat missions, close air support sorties, heavy bombing missions, helicopter rescue missions, air evacuation of the wounded, supply transport missions, and reconnaissance.
America, not knowing where the conflict would lead because of the threat of and eventual intervention by Communist Chinese forces as well as Soviet Block activities in Eastern Europe, again increased the strength of the US Air Force.
And at the cessation of hostilities, in June 1953, there was not an appreciable decrease in the Air Force's strength; the Korean War had forewarned the danger posed by Communist threats throughout the world.
Also, the nation realized it would have to help and protect smaller and less fortunate countries that embraced democratic governments.
These efforts have culminated with America's winning of the Cold War, the dissolution of communist regimes all over the world, victories over tyranny such as in the Persian Gulf War, and the protection of American interests all over the world.
But as the world changes in response to these events, so must the Air Force.
More and more the Air Force is becoming a humanitarian force as well as a warfighting force.
Air Force members are just as likely now to respond to natural disasters as they are to military threats.
Also, the nature of conflict has changed.
For over 40 years the Air Force prepared for global conflict not unlike what was experienced in World War II, but with the possible addition of nuclear weapons.
With the collapse of the Soviet Union and the proliferation of modern weapons and technology to smaller and less stable countries, conflicts have become more unpredictable.
There are more conflicts, they are regional in nature, and affect the global balance in different ways.
It is harder to intercede on the large scale that we based our plans and forces on for so long.
So, when America asks its Air Force to get involved in these smaller, less predictable conflicts, the Air Force must adapt and rise to the challenge.
Many times, this means that the Air Force must be present in several areas of the world at one time -- assisting flood victims in one country, enforcing a peace agreement in another, and protecting another country against invasion in yet another while still protecting its own nation's vital interests.
And yet it must do so with a smaller force than it had during the Cold War.
Nonetheless, the US Air Force will remain a strong force, continually improving the training of its people and quality of its materiel in order to most effectively carry out its mission whatever it may be.
22 Mission and Organization of the Air Force The specific functions of the Air Force for agreed upon in 1948 at meetings of the chiefs of the armed services.
These meetings were concerned not only with the United States Air Force, but also with the other armed services.
In other words, because of the reorganization there was a need for a clear understanding as to the exact role and mission of each service.
The National Security Act was amended in 1949, the result of which was to re-designate the National Military Establishment as the Department of Defense.
The Departments of the Air Force, Army and Navy, each headed by a civilian Secretary, were placed under the new Department of Defense (DoD).
The Secretary of the Air Force (SECAF), appointed by the President of the United States, has a military-civilian staff to assist with planning and advise in such areas as research and development, installations and logistics, financial management, personnel and reserve forces, administration and legal matters (nonmilitary), legislative liaison, and public information.
Headquarters USAF Directly subordinate to the Secretary of the Air Force is the Chief of Staff, USAF, who presides over the Air Staff.
The Air Staff is made up of special offices headed by an Air Force general officer.
The plans and recommendations formulated by the Air Staff are submitted by the Chief of Staff who reviews and sends them on to the SECAF.
After the SECAF approves them, the Chief of Staff takes appropriate action.
These items pertain to the training, equipping, and overall welfare of the force, while war planning rests with the Secretary of Defense (SECDEF) and the Commanders in Chief of the Unified Commands.
The Vice Chief of Staff is the immediate assistant to the Chief of staff.
The Assistant Vice Chief of Staff is the third position on the Air Staff.
The general officer in this position assists in reviewing the plans formulated by the other staff members and has the responsibility of general supervision over the organization and administration of the Air Staff.
Duties of other offices on the Air Staff are to gather information for planning in the areas of intelligence, reserve forces, analysis, inspection, legal matters (military justice), medicine, religion, science, personnel, administration, etc.
The Major Commands and Separate Operating Agencies The next echelon in the Air Force organization is the field organization, consisting of major commands and separate operating agencies who report to the Chief of Staff.
These major commands and separate operating agencies carry out the plans formulated by the Chief of Staff and approved by the Secretary of the Air Force.
These plans are in direct proportion to the overall mission of the USAF, which is essentially to provide an Air Force that is capable, in conjunction with the other armed forces, of preserving the peace and security of the United States, providing for its defense, supporting the national policies, implementing the national objectives, and overcoming any national responsible for aggressive acts that imperil the peace and security of the United States.
To support these commitments, the Air Force prepares and maintains the aerospace forces necessary for the effective prosecution of war.
To meet these awesome responsibilities, the commands and separate operating agencies must be highly organized, yet flexible.
Many CAP members are probably familiar with some of the Air Force's major commands, such as the Air Force Space Command, or Air Force Materiel Command, and so on.
However, the major command most associated with CAP activities is Air Education and Training Command.
This major air 23 command, with its broad educational mission in support of the Air Force, assists CAP in fulfilling its role as the official Air Force Auxiliary through its chief agent, Air University.
Organization of the Civil Air Patrol After reviewing the organization and mission of the US Air Force, we can now look into the organizational structure of Civil Air Patrol.
But before we do, remember that CAP is a civilian corporation chartered by Congress and made up of volunteers who pay dues for the privilege of being a member of CAP and rendering a service to the nation as the Auxiliary of the USAF.
Although CAP members wear an adaptation of the Air Force uniform, have an organization that is patterned after that of the Air Force, and perform their duties in a military manner, they are still civilians.
CAP is organized into eight geographic regions.
These eight regions are subdivided by the states which fall within their boundaries, and each state is classified as a wing.
Additionally, the District of Columbia referred to in CAP terminology as the National Capital and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico are also designated as wings, for a total of 52 wings.
Each wing is then subdivided into groups, squadrons and flights, according to the organizational need.
We shall discuss each of these organizational structures later, but first we shall start "at the top" and understand the chain of command and the function of each structure in that chain of command.
24 UNITED STATES AIR FORCE CIVIL AIR PATROL Headquarters, USAF Air Force Auxiliary Board Board of Governors HQ Air Education and Training Command USAF Inspector General Membership Action Review Board HQ Air University USAF National Board and National Executive Committee HQ CAP-USAF Executive Director National Headquarters Region Liaison Offices (8 Offices) CAP Regions (8 Commands) Wing Liaison Offices (52 Offices) CAP Wings (52 Commands) CAP Groups (Optional) CAP Senior Squadrons CAP Composite Squadrons CAP Cadet Squadrons NOTE: Air Force personnel operate the organization on the left, Civil Air Patrol volunteers operate the organization on the right.
A paid, professional staff runs the National Headquarters.
*CAP Flights *Flights may be assigned to squadrons, groups, or wings.
25 Board of Governors As part of CAP's reorganization of 2000-2001, Civil Air Patrol, Public Law 106-398, established the CAP Board of Governors (BOG) as the primary governing body of Civil Air Patrol.
This new body is vested with complete governing power over the affairs of the CAP Corporation.
Typically, the BOG reserves its decision making role for the strategic issues concerning the organization, such as long-term policy, allocation of Air Force appropriated and CAP funds, amending CAP's Constitution and By-Laws, administer and oversee the Inspector General program, and issues of like scope and impact, but can look into any of CAP's activities.
It delegates the dayto-day operations and decision-making to the two subordinate governing bodies, the CAP National Board and National Executive Committee, as well as to the National Headquarters staff.
The board of Governors consists of an 11-member body including: v Four members of the Civil Air Patrol: the National Commander, National ViceCommander (permanent positions), and two Members-at-Large selected from the field, who serve a three-year term and are selected by CAP. v Four members appointed by the Secretary of the Air Force, who may be active or retired officers of the Air Force, employees of the United States, or private citizens.
v The Board's final three members are selected jointly by the Secretary of Air Force and the CAP National Commander; may represent any government agency, public corporation, non-profit organization, or other organization with both an interest and expertise in civil aviation and CAP's missions.
The Chair of the Board of Governors is alternated between the USAF and CAP.
The Chair's term is for two years.
The National Board Did you know? The first Chair of the Board of Governors is retired Lt Gen Nicholas B. Kehoe, former USAF Inspector General.
Working closely with the Board of Governors is the National Board, chaired by a member of the Civil Air Patrol Corporation known as the National Commander.
Although we have implied that the Civil Air Patrol is a purely civilian organization, at every level, that is not absolutely true.
One member of the National Board is the Senior Air Force Advisor, who is an active-duty Air Force officer.
All other members of the National Board are CAP members and include, among others, the eight CAP region commanders and 52 CAP wing commanders, all of whom hold the grade of CAP Colonel.
At least twice annually (winter and summer), the National Board convenes to conduct Civil Air Patrol business as empowered by the BOG.
At the summer session, elections are held for certain offices.
The members of the National Board and how they achieve their positions are as follows:     The National Commander (elected by the National Board).
The National Vice-Commander (elected by the National Board).
The Senior Air Force Advisor (appointed by the Secretary of the Air Force.
This officer may not hold any other corporate office).
The National Chief of Staff (appointed by the National Commander and confirmed by the National Executive Committee).
26        The National Finance Officer (appointed by the National Commander and confirmed by the National Board).
The National Legal Officer (appointed by the National Commander and confirmed by the National Board).
The National Controller (appointed by the National Commander and confirmed by the National Board) Chief of the CAP Chaplain Service (appointed by the National Commander and confirmed by the Board, a nonvoting member).
CAP Inspector General (appointed by the National commander and confirmed by the National Board, a nonvoting member, and can only be removed by a majority vote of the Board of Governors).
Region Commanders (appointed by the National Commander).
Wing Commanders (appointed by their respective Region Commander).
The National Executive Committee Since the National Board convenes only twice each year, it needs a representative body to carry through its programs.
The National Executive Committee, or NEC, serves this purpose.
The NEC is comprised of the National Commander, National Vice Commander, National Chief of Staff, the Senior Air Force Advisor, National Finance Officer, the National Legal Officer, National Controller, CAP Inspector General, Chief of the CAP Chaplain Service, and the eight Region Commanders.
The NEC also convenes twice annually (usually fall and spring, but on other occasions as required).
Did you know? The Chief of the CAP Chaplain Service and the CAP Inspector General are nonvoting members of the National Board and NEC.
While the National Board formulates policy at the discretion of the BOG, the NEC has the responsibilities of reviewing reports, recommending the appropriation and raising of funds, providing advice on the corporation's investments, negotiating contracts, establishing trusts and appointing trustees, and accounting for expenditures, as empowered by the BOG.
The Senior Air Force Advisor and Headquarters CAP-USAF As a member of the National Board and the NEC, the Senior Air Force Advisor is the primary Air Force official working with Civil Air Patrol.
In this capacity the advisor assists the Civil Air Patrol with balancing its corporate responsibilities with the needs of the Air Force.
The advisor clarifies Air Force policies on issues pertaining to Civil Air Patrol, ensuring that Air Force appropriated funds are used properly, and assists CAP in getting the assistance it needs to carry out its missions.
The Senior Air Force Advisor wears "two hats."
Not only does the Senior Air Force Advisor act in what we call the "advice, liaison, and oversight" role, this officer is also the military commander of a headquarters and field liaison staff of USAF personnel and DoD civilians assigned to Civil Air PatrolUnited States Air Force (CAP-USAF).
Included in this command are the subordinate CAP Liaison Region Commanders and their staffs (counterparts to CAP regions), and reserve officers and enlisted personnel assigned to the CAP Reserve Assistance Program (CAP RAP), and the State Liaison Directors and Deputy Directors.
The National Headquarters of CAP and CAP USAF are co-located at Maxwell AFB, Alabama.
The Senior Air Force Advisor is responsible to the Commander of Air University for those actions pertaining to USAF business.
27 The Executive Director and Headquarters, Civil Air Patrol The Executive Director of Civil Air Patrol is the executive agent of the Civil Air Patrol Corporation.
As specified in the Constitution and Bylaws, the executive director administers the programs of Civil Air Patrol in accordance with the resolutions of the Board of Governors, National Board, and NEC.
In essence, the Executive Director is the chief operating officer for the CAP Corporation, and supervises the corporate headquarters staff, the CAP Bookstore and the Supply Depot, and the National Technology Center.
Headquarters Civil Air Patrol is composed of four parts the headquarters staff, the CAP Bookstore, the Supply Depot, and the National Technology Center.
The headquarters staff are employees of the Civil Air Patrol Corporation whose job it is to implement the policies and programs authorized by CAP's governing bodies.
Their responsibilities represent each of CAP's three faceted primary mission (Emergency Services, Aerospace Education and the Cadet Program), and the mission support areas necessary to augment the missions such as, marketing and public relations, finance, information management, printing plant, senior programs, personnel, etc.
In addition, the headquarters also encompasses the CAP Bookstore, which sells CAP uniforms, insignia, ribbons, publications and supplies to the CAP membership.
The Supply Depot sells aircraft parts, search and rescue equipment, radios and other equipment as well as aerospace education supplies.
Finally, the National Technology Center is the central clearing house for all CAP communications equipment, repairing and distributing CAP's ground communications capability.
The CAP Field Organization We might compare the field organization of Civil Air Patrol to that of the USAF.
Each has a mission to accomplish and certain territorial areas in which to operate.
However, the Air Force has broken its field organizations into major commands which are designated to perform specific mission functions to greater and lesser degrees.
On the other hand, the CAP field organization units all have equal responsibility for carrying out the CAP mission, but they do it within certain territorial boundaries, first by groups of states and then by individual states.
The CAP Region These are the first levels of command in the CAP field organization structure.
As we have said before, there are eight separate CAP regions which involve the 50 states, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and the District of Columbia.
Commanding each region is a CAP officer, holding the grade of Colonel.
Each region commander is appointed by the National Commander.
The region commander may then appoint a vice commander and a staff for assistance.
The region vice commander and staff perform those administrative duties peculiar to the region level, but the region commander retains responsibility for all CAP activities within the region.
Did you know? CAP regions were originally organized to mirror organizations called Army Service Commands stationed in the United States during world War II.
In the CAP organizational chart you may have noticed the dotted line connecting the block representing the CAP regions and the block representing the CAP-USAF liaison offices.
This dotted line indicates liaison or advisory service which is the mission of the CAP-USAF liaison region office.
As a field extension of the advisory service provided by CAP-USAF, the Air Force Liaison Region 28 Commander and staff advise the Civil Air Patrol Region Commander in the areas of organization, administration, operations, training, aerospace education, supply and similar activities.
Also, Air Force liaison offices maintain an interchange of information between CAP-USAF, the state director offices, and the CAP wing officials within their region.
The CAP Wing This is the command level assigned to each state, the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico.
Wing commanders are appointed by their respective Region commanders and also hold the grade of CAP colonel.
Like the region commanders, wing commanders may appoint a staff to assist them with their duties.
The CAP Wing commander is the sole corporate official within their wing, and has the power to negotiate agreements with state agencies and represent the CAP Corporation within their state.
They are also ultimately responsible for the execution of the CAP mission within their territory.
Also helping the wing commanders are the CAP State Directors and Deputy Directors.
These people are usually retired Air Force members who have been hired by CAP-USAF to act as the USAF advice and oversight officials for the wing.
The state director's office serves the most of the same purposes as the CAP-USAF liaison office does to the region.
Below wing level there is no USAF oversight office.
However, each Air Force base commander appoints a permanent project officer on the base to coordinate with CAP-USAF personnel to assist units needing or seeking support.
The CAP Wing commanders appoint group and squadron commanders within their respective wings.
This brings us to the last three organizational levels within CAP: groups, squadrons, and flights.
 CAP Groups: The group organizational units are established by wing commanders when they determine a need for them.
The need arises when there is a large geographic area or a large number of squadrons that cannot be managed by a single office.
There must be a minimum of five squadrons within each group formed.
CAP Squadrons: The squadron is the very heart Did you know? of Civil Air Patrol.
It is CAP's operational unit that actually carries out all of those plans and programs formulated and directed by higher There are three types of squadrons in echelons.
Squadrons are trained to furnish CAP.
Senior squadrons are only staffed assistance to their communities, states, and nation with senior (adult) members.
in times of national disasters, aircraft accidents, Composite squadrons have robust cadet national emergencies, or war.
Squadrons recruit and senior components, and cadet new members into CAP; they provide the squadrons are minimally staffed with instruction of aerospace education for CAP senior members, catering mostly to cadets.
Simply stated, squadrons are the CAP CAP's youth program.
program! Flights: The flight, as a separate organizational element, is established only if the need arises and that need usually occurs in sparsely populated areas where there aren't enough members to form a squadron.
A flight can be composed of up to 14 members, but there are definite restrictions as to its minimum personnel staffing.
Where there are eight senior members a flight may be formed, but if the flight is to be composed of both seniors and cadets it must have at least three senior members.
The flight, according to its remoteness, may report directly to either a squadron, a group, or to its wing as the wing commander directs.
The goal of each flight is to increase its membership so it may become a squadron as soon as possible.
  29 Civil Air Patrol Charters The regions and wings have permanent charters, as established in the Civil Air Patrol Constitution and Bylaws.
But, below wing level each organizational unit must be individually chartered.
If there is a new unit established within the wing be it a group, squadron, or flight the wing commander requests a charter from Headquarters Civil Air Patrol.
These charters are current so long as the unit maintains the minimum staffing levels required for the type of unit it is chartered to be (senior, composite, cadet).
Did you know? CAP units are issued a charter number based on their region, wing and unit number, for instance: MER-MD-001 (Middle East Region, Maryland Wing, Unit 001 [Wing Headquarters]).
This system was put in place in early 2001.
From 1955 2001 however, CAP units used a five-digit designator based on alphabetical order of the wings, for instance: 19001 (19 = Massachusetts, 001 = wing headquarters).
National Capital Wing came before Nebraska in order, Alaska and Hawaii were added later in order when they were granted statehood, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, not being a state was last in the sequence of states.
30 Chapter Three The CAP Member CAP is an organization of civilians who volunteer to serve their community and country.
As in all volunteer organizations, it has requirements to determine who can belong as we shall see in later discussion.
Civil Air Patrol expects to be around for many, many years to come and it seeks to enroll and retain those members who can continue its tradition of great service to the Air Force and to America.
As a reminder, although CAP members may wear a uniform and actively render vital services to America, service in CAP does not satisfy any military service obligation a member may have.
However, the experience and training gained in CAP will provide members with an advantage over other who have not had such training, should they choose to enter military service.
Membership Classifications CAP Senior Members CAP members must be at least 18 years of age, but there is no maximum age.
 Active members are those who take an active part in the senior member program.
Active members attend unit meetings, perform specific duty assignments, take part in the training program and other unit activities.
Patron members are financial supporters who contribute through payment of annual membership dues, but do not participate in the active program.
They are entitled to limited benefits as outlined in CAP regulations.
Cadet sponsor members also have a more limited role in CAP.
While they do not wear uniforms or participate in missions or the normal training program, they can act as chaperones and drivers for cadet activities.
They are also entitled to limited benefits as outlined in CAP publications.
Retired membership is the category reserved for those senior members who have served as active CAP members for 20 years.
Those 20 years of membership do not have to be continuous.
Retired members retain the grade earned during their active service, but do not qualify for 31     further increase in grade, unless they elect to return to active status.
Retired members do not participate in the CAP program in any capacity.
Life membership is a special honor bestowed on an individual in recognition of services rendered to Civil Air Patrol.
As one of its highest honors, life membership is awarded only by CAP's National Board.
Note that seniors in the active category and all those in the cadet sponsor category must also undergo a FBI criminal record history check.
This is a routine and confidential procedure, and is done for the general protection of the cadet membership.
Aerospace Education Members This is a special membership category reserved for individuals who have an active interest in aerospace education.
Any reputable individual or organization that has an interest in supporting CAP's aerospace education program.
AEMs do not wear uniforms and do not participate in the regular membership programs.
Generally speaking, AEMs help to promote Civil Air Patrol's nationwide aerospace education program to both school students and the general public.
Business Members Corporations, formal partnerships, or formal businesses may be listed in this category.
In essence, the corporation becomes a member but not the employees, and the company financially supports CAP's mission and associated programs.
Cadet Membership Initial cadet membership is open to young people who are attending the sixth grade through 18 years of age.
Once a cadet, they may choose to remain in the program until their 21st birthday.
Being a Civil Air Patrol cadet is a rewarding experience and completing the program is an extraordinary achievement.
To qualify for cadet membership, each candidate must be:      A United States citizen or an alien admitted for permanent residence Of good moral character A graduate of or be enrolled in private or public school and making satisfactory progress Single Not be a member of the armed forces on active duty (but may be a service academy cadet) To remain a cadet member, the person must be certain to renew their membership each year.
The cadet membership, as it's known, begins the month the application is processed by National Headquarters and ends the last day of that month the following year.
Sometime during the three months preceding the last day of the membership year, the cadet must renew the membership; otherwise, the membership will be automatically terminated (this process is the same for senior membership).
If automatic termination does occur by this means, it does not preclude the cadet from reapplying, and the cadet will receive credit for accomplishments completed during the prior period of membership.
Because of the nature of cadet membership, cadets may lose their status in certain situations.
32 Automatic loss of cadet status occurs when the cadet:    Reaches their 21st birthday.
Joins the Armed Forces and enters active duty (excluding enrollment in service academies).
Fails to maintain a satisfactory academic school record.
Cadets turning 21, who are 18 years old and marry, or who enter active duty are required to transfer to the senior program if they otherwise meet initial membership requirements.
For more information, refer to CAPR 35-3, Membership Termination.
CAP Member Compensation, Hospitalization, and Insurance There is no requirement to participate in any CAP activity which may endanger your health of life.
However, if you happen to be involved in any type of accident while on an Air Force authorized mission and sometimes while traveling to or from the mission provision is made for your compensation in case of injury or for survivor benefits in case of death.
These benefits are provided for senior members and cadets 18 years of age and over through a bill known as the Federal Employees Compensation Act (FECA).
In short, the FECA provides that certain monetary benefits be paid according to the type of disabling injury received and, in the case of death, the individual's family receives a monthly compensation.
To be eligible for FECA compensation, the CAP member must have been engaged in an authorized mission directed by the Air Force.
Cadets under 18 years of age are not covered by FECA; therefore, they are not authorized to participate in operational missions where danger to their well-being is more likely, such as being an aircrew member on search and rescue missions.
All cadets and senior members engaged in authorized activities are included as possible recipients of medical care rendered by the US Air Force.
Such medical care is contingent upon the availability of those services at military hospitals.
Availability means that there are enough beds and medical personnel to absorb the additional work load.
As pointed out in Chapter 2, any service rendered by the USAF to Civil Air Patrol members will be rendered without adversely affecting the Air Force mission.
Even in the case of hospital or medical care, military personnel must come first.
Remember also that the injury or illness must have occurred while on an authorized CAP activity.
Travel to and from the duty site is also considered part of the mission if the mission is performed under an Air Force mission number.
The Federal Employees Compensation Act, as stated before, does not include cadets under 18 years of age.
But all cadets may take part in ground search missions, serve as ground crew members during flight operations, go on orientation flights, etc.
Since there is always a remote possibility of injury during such activities, you might ask, "Are cadets covered by any sort of protection?" Yes, Civil Air Patrol provides limited medical coverage for each cadet member, and is effective until the membership is terminated.
The cadet is protected by this program when taking part in authorized CAP activities which are under the supervision of a CAP senior member.
Civil Air Patrol Publications Civil Air Patrol wants its members to be well informed about events taking place CAP-wide and is active with printed news media and a nation-wide network of internet sites to give its members the most accurate and up-to-date information.
The Civil Air Patrol News is published for the benefit of the membership.
This monthly publication contains news of activities in the wings, at National 33 Headquarters, or any other source that presents news of interest to CAP members.
Part of your membership dues goes to pay for your individual subscription to the CAP News.
Headquarters Civil Air Patrol also uses a network of internet sites to give you access to up-todate information about CAP news and activities from across the country.
CAP's own web site (http://www.capnhq.gov), publishes a wide variety of news, information and training items for CAP members.
This site also has links to hundreds of CAP and Air Force-related sites across the country.
Other "news type" publications originating from National Headquarters will be sent to your unit from time to time.
At every unit meeting you should check the reading file, bulletin board, or library and read all of the new information.
In other words, keep current! No doubt your region, wing, and local unit will have news publications for you and the other members.
These publications are just as important as the national media, because they let you know what's happening in your local area, and will give you the supplementary information (activity dates, requirements, etc.) you need to be an active member.
Publications of a more lasting nature are printed in the forms of numbered manuals and regulations commonly referred to as directives.
Numbers, such as 39-1 and 5017, precede titles to these types of publications, and we should take a minute to see why these numbers are used.
Did you know? Most CAP publications, including regulations, manuals, and forms, are available for download on CAP's web page; at www.capnhq.gov.
Forms may also be requested from HQ-CAP/MSA.
Regulations, manuals, pamphlets, and other books may also be purchased from the CAP Bookstore.
The numbers appearing before the dash indicate the series and the number after the dash designate the specific publication in the series.
For example, for "39-1," "39" stands for Personnel-General; and the "1" stands for the first in the Personnel-General series of manuals.
Likewise, "39" would be the number preceding all directives pertaining to the Personnel-General subject, but the second number might be any number.
It is helpful to learn the basic series numbers used in Civil Air Patrol publications because knowing the general area in which to look for a publication that dealing with a specific subject will help you find the answers to your questions faster.
Also, it's quite common to refer to directives by their number only, such as "I read in CAP Regulation 50-17..." and it's helpful to know at least the general area of their discussion.
Below is a list of CAP's basic series numbers for publications and the areas they represent:            0 Indexes and Visual Aids 5 Publications Management (such as how publications will be distributed, numbered, etc.)
10 Administrative Communications (such as how letters will be prepared, signature elements, address structure, etc) 20 Organization and Mission General (such as how cadet and senior squadrons will be organized) 35 Personnel Procedures 39 Personnel General 50 Training 52 Cadet Program Training 60 Flying, Operations, and ES Training 62 Safety 66 Maintenance of CAP aircraft 34                   67 Supply 70 Contracting Management 76 Transportation (such as travel of CAP members in military aircraft) 77 Motor Vehicles 87 Real Estate 100 Communications 110 Information Technology 112 Claims (such as processing claims CAP members may have arising out of CAP activities) 123 Inspections 147 Exchange Service (concerning privileges CAP members have at base exchanges when taking part in authorized CAP activities) 160 Medical 173 Finance 178 Management Analysis 190 Public Affairs 210 Historical Data and Properties 265 CAP Chaplain Service 280 Aerospace Education 900 Miscellaneous (all those regulations and manuals which cannot be published under another numbered series because of the special nature of their content insurance, for example.)
You've probably noticed that there are numbers missing from the series.
This is because CAP parallels the old USAF series numbering system, but only those areas pertaining to its operation.
Civil Air Patrol may also publish numbered pamphlets (like this one) and handbooks, as well as unnumbered leaflets and other booklets.
But most CAP publications - especially those that specify what to do or how to do it will use this system.
If you want to look up specific information about a subject, there is an index in your administrative publications files which will direct you to the publications containing the information you desire.
This is known as CAP Index 0-2.
Here you will find a list of all current CAP directivetype publications and visual aids placed under the series numbers we've just discussed; it carries both the complete number and title of the publication.
Another index, CAP Index 0-9, lists all the forms, tests and certificates used in Civil Air Patrol.
35 36 Chapter Four Accomplishing the Civil Air Patrol Mission We have discussed the history and beginning of Civil Air Patrol organization and relationship to the United States Air Force in Chapter 2.
how Civil Air Patrol actually accomplishes its mission.
First though, take a "objects and purposes" of Civil Air Patrol as they appear in Article VI Constitution and Bylaws. in Chapter 1, and its Now we will examine moment and review the of the Civil Air Patrol a.
To provide an organization to encourage and aid American citizens in the contribution of their efforts, services, and resources in the development of aviation and the maintenance of aerospace supremacy. b.
To encourage and develop by example the voluntary contribution of private citizens to the public welfare.
c.
To provide aviation and aerospace education and training, especially to its senior and cadet members.
d.
To encourage and foster civil aviation in local communities.
e.
To provide an organization of private citizens with adequate facilities to assist in meeting local and national emergencies.
From these "objects and purposes," we have a broad scope, the CAP three-part mission can be stated more specifically to provide:    An aerospace education program; A CAP cadet program; and, An emergency services program The symbol of CAP's three-bladed propeller is used to illustrate how the three-part mission works together to become the foundation and purpose of CAP.
The three-faceted mission of CAP is represented by the three blades of our symbol -- CAP's three bladed propeller.
Its hub represents the members who make the program work.
If a blade was removed from the blade a mission facet removed from CAP's organization it would fall out of balance and be ineffective.
It's important to realize that CAP's success in accomplishing the mission is dependent on the success of each of the facets.
37 Administration of Civil Air Patrol Mission Activities From the National Commander, with the Board of Governors' approval, administrative responsibilities for the region, wing, group, and squadron are delegated to the respective commanders.
The Executive Director, who directs the National Headquarters staff and also reports to the Board of Governors, performs this task for the day to day operations of the CAP as a corporation.
Beginning at National Headquarters and extending downward to the squadron, each command element must recruit a staff of responsible people whose job is to carry out the day-to-day tasks necessary to accomplish the CAP mission.
Thus, the combined skills of CAP members at the various organizational levels provide for systematic and successful administration of the organization.
Since CAP is the auxiliary of the USAF, and is organized along military lines, its administrative staffs are similar to those of the USAF.
However, the conduct of CAP business may require certain adjustments in a typical staff, resulting in either larger or smaller staffs according to each unit's needs and resources.
In addition to the squadron commander and deputy(ies), a typical CAP composite squadron may perform all of the following functions and may require a staff officer for each: Information Management Aerospace Education Cadet Program Chaplain Civil Defense Communications Emergency Services Finance Inspection Leadership Training Legal Affairs and Legislative Liaison Maintenance Medical Mission Training Moral Leadership Operations Personnel Marketing and Public Relations Safety Senior Programs Supply Testing Transportation By assigning a staff officer to more than one function, a squadron commander may find that they can accomplish the mission without appointing a staff officer for every function.
This can be a major concern in a smaller squadron.
Before doing so however, the commander must take care to not overload the staff with too much work.
As you learned in Chapter 2, there are three classifications of CAP squadrons: the composite squadron, the cadet squadron, and the senior squadron.
The composite squadron has two distinct subsidiaries one for seniors and one for cadets.
The cadet squadron is comprised, for all practical purposes, entirely of cadets except for a minimum of senior members who carry out certain command and administrative functions and mentor the cadet squadron members.
The senior squadron is comprised entirely of senior members.
CAP Regulation 20-1, Organization of Civil Air Patrol has more information on the types of CAP organizations.
38 Civilian businesses evaluate their progress through a system of reports, audits, inventories, conferences, etc.
Civil Air Patrol uses a system of inspections, annual awards, and conferences to do the same thing.
The inspection system is designed to measure activities in terms of standardization and mission accomplishment; at the same time, the inspection reports are used as a management and quality enhancement tool; providing commanders at all levels the information they need to administer their units properly.
CAP models their structure and customs to mirror the US Air Force.
CAP awards, specifically ones for squadron of merit and distinction, use specific performance criteria to measure unit effectiveness in areas such as recruiting, retention, and achievement.
Finally, regions and wings conduct conferences and commanders' calls during the year during which operational problems are analyzed and solved; progress for the previous year is reviewed, and goals are established.
Now that we've discussed how the unit's are administered to accomplish the mission, let's take a closer look at each part of the mission in more detail.
CAP Emergency Services CAP's talents have augmented the Air Force in search and rescue and disaster relief since CAP's formation in 1941.
It has always been there to assist the nation in times of disaster or in any emergency situation when its resources people and equipment can be used.
The Emergency Services (ES) primary mission objective is to save lives and relieve human suffering.
To be effective, the lives of CAP personnel performing the mission must be safeguarded.
CAP demands professionalism in organization, training, and mission execution to accomplish this service.
Only members who are qualified or are in formal emergency services training are allowed to participate in actual missions.
The ES mission includes search and rescue and disaster relief operations.
Search and Rescue (SAR) The National Search and Rescue plan assigns responsibility for coordinating inland SAR operations in the United States to the Air Force.
The actual coordination is performed by the Air Force Rescue Coordination Center, based at Langley AFB, Virginia.
This coordination is performed by the US Coast Guard in Puerto Rico and by the Joint Rescue Coordination Center (JRCC) in Alaska and Hawaii.
CAP supports all three and is the primary resource available for inland SAR.
In fact, CAP routinely performs on average over 85% of the SAR missions for inland search and rescue.
Did you know? CAP uses over 530 corporate aircraft, nearly 1,000 corporate vehicles, and thousands of corporate radio and computer equipment to support missions including ES? 39 All CAP members who participate in SAR operations are volunteers who have been specially trained in a variety of emergency services skills.
These operations must be carried out with speed and efficiency because victims' lives may be at stake.
This speed and efficiency is attained through prior planning and practical exercises in performing the tasks required.
CAP units may not participate in a SAR mission unless they have people trained to quickly and successfully accomplish the mission.
A wing may have several units which are trained and "on-call" for SAR activities, but the wing commander usually assigns the mission to the unit nearest to the area of operations.
This ensures familiarity with the terrain in the search area; enhances the relationships with neighboring agencies (police, fire, etc), and ensures a quick response.
Larger missions often require units from all over the wing or even neighboring wings to participate.
This only increases the need for professionalism and control over operations.
As you have already gleaned, a SAR mission is always a serious and critical endeavor.
Good organization, methodical procedures, and safety are essential.
Therefore, each CAP mission is headed by a CAP incident commander who is experienced and highly qualified in Emergency Services.
SAR missions can be quite involved with many functions and activities to be supervised and accomplished.
Some of these activities include:    Incident Command the overall responsibility for each specific mission is invested in one CAP officer, the Incident Commander.
Administration involves mission personnel registration; flight orders; reimbursement claims (for fuel, oil, etc.); and control of required mission reports.
Communications may be radio, telephone, fax, electronic mail, or messenger service.
A communications officer establishes the net and controls the activities of all communications personnel.
He or she also prepares briefing materials relative to the communications procedures to be used by mission personnel.
Air Operations by the Air Operations Officer, responsible for coordinating all airborne activity under the overall supervision of the mission coordinator.
This officer verifies the qualifications of air crews; supervises crew briefings; maintains the mission status board with the appropriate and timely information; and supervises the staff under his or her charge.
Ground Operations controlled by the ground operations officer.
Very similar to the responsibilities of the Air Operations officer, but related those tasks to surface operations.
Mission Chaplain is assigned to both air and ground operations as needed.
   Disaster Relief (DR) Operations In 1979, several federal agencies we combined into one the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA).
FEMA is the single point of contact within the federal system for disaster relief planning and management.
This includes civil defense, natural disaster, and man-made emergencies.
Did you know? CAP is a primary resource for providing disaster relief during such events as Hurricanes Hugo and Andrew, the 1993 Missouri floods, and the September 11th attacks? The Civil Air Patrol has national level agreements with many government and non-government relief agencies to assist when disaster strikes.
Over the years, CAP has worked closely with organizations such as FEMA, the American Red Cross, and the Salvation Army.
CAP also has agreements with local agencies at the wing level and participates with various state emergency management agencies.
40 The US Army has overall responsibility for coordinating disaster relief efforts involving Department of Defense (DoD) agencies.
The Air Force supports the Army.
As the volunteer auxiliary of the Air Force, the CAP may participate in the Military Support to Civil Authorities (MCSA) program.
The organization of CAP DR efforts is very similar to the SAR mission.
The main difference is the agency that controls the mission.
CAP always retains command of CAP resources, but mission control is delegated, usually at the state level, to the agency primarily responsible for a particular DR operation.
Under MSCA the Air Force Reserve coordinates and does the tasking through its Air Force National Security Emergency Preparedness (AFNSEP) office.
The AFNSEP office is co-located with the Army Forces Command at Fort McPherson, GA.
After receiving an Air Force mission authorization, CAP works directly with the agency that requested help and performs the activities specifically requested, within CAP's capability.
The types of DR missions CAP supports include:        Courier and light cargo transport.
Mercy missions blood, organ transplant, and patient transport (life-saving evacuations).
Manual labor for debris removal.
Air and ground transport for cargo and non-CAP key personnel.
Damage surveying.
Communications support.
Etc.
Two good examples of the types of support CAP gives in Disaster Relief operations is illustrated by its efforts during the 1993 Missouri Flood and CAP's response to the September 11, 2001 attacks.
During the summer of 1993, the Mississippi River overflowed its banks and caused the worst flooding in over 100 years, flooding millions of acres of land, and submerging whole towns and cities.
Civil Air Patrol members from across the country came to the aid of flood victims: filling sandbags, surveying damage, flying everything from mail to emergency supplies to needed areas, establishing emergency communications links and ferrying government officials.
CAP members were also among the first to respond to the September 11th attacks on New York, Washington, and Pennsylvania, providing communications, emergency transfer of blood, supplies, and people, and rendering other types of assistance as requested by state and federal agencies.
Counterdrug Operations In 1985, U.S. Customs Service asked CAP to support counterdrug operations.
Our first large-scale operation with Customs primarily involved reconnaissance and feedback on suspicious boats and ships off the East and Gulf coasts.
In 1986, Congress authorized CAP to support law enforcement in the government's war on drugs.
CAP began its support of the Drug Enforcement Administration and U.S. Forest Service in 1989.
Originally operations were primarily for marijuana eradication support within the United States and its territories and possessions.
Did you know? CAP counterdrug operations led to the confiscation of millions of dollars worth of illegal drugs every year, helping to keep your neighborhood safe.
41 Today, the mission of CAP's counterdrug program is to assist federal, state and local government and law enforcement agencies involved in the fight to eliminate illicit drug use, its production and sale in the U.S., its territories and possessions.
CAP is involved in combating both the demand for and supply of illegal drugs.
CAP provides aircraft, aircrews and other personnel to support counterdrug activities.
Many federal agencies as well as state and local law enforcement agencies and drug task forces routinely call on CAP to provide counterdrug support.
It should be noted, however, that CAP has no law enforcement authority and may not participate in law enforcement operations.
CAP provides three main counterdrug interdiction missions: aerial reconnaissance, communication and transportation.
All Air Force-assigned counterdrug missions must have a counterdrug "nexus," that is they must involve a counterdrug case or operation.
Valid operations include:            Marijuana eradication support flights conducted to detect suspicious vegetation or likely growing areas for marijuana.
Airborne reconnaissance flown to detect potential drug operations or gather intelligence on isolated areas known to be used by drug traffickers.
Also flown on a recurring basis to examine border-crossing areas.
Marine reconnaissance routine reconnaissance to detect and report suspicious marine activity in coastal areas and to detect and identify waterborne vessels.
Airport reconnaissance recurring or periodic reconnaissance of airports or their surrounding access routes for evidence or likelihood of use for drug trafficking.
Airfield photography conducted to locate, identify, photograph, and catalog charted and uncharted airfields and landing areas.
Airborne video/digital photography and imagery flown to document conditions of areas or facilities to detect change, use or suspicious activity.
Communications support usually flown in remote locations to provide an aerial communications relay platform and/or in support of over-water operations where normal communications will be a problem.
Radar evaluation flown to evaluate and calibrate air defense radars and provide controller and/or interceptor training.
Aerial familiarization of law enforcement agents conducted to familiarize agents with aircraft and their use in conducting law enforcement operations.
Drug demand reduction orientation flights in conjunction with DDR program events for CAP cadets are permitted.
Transportation of DDR personnel and materials to DDR events.
Transportation mission may be conducted under limited circumstances.
Homeland Security Homeland security is Civil Air Patrol's heritage.
The terrorist attacks that occurred on September 11, 2001 caused the United States to reexamine its homeland security mission.
No longer immune from attacks on its home soil, the United States must use all of its resources to meet an enemy that knows no national, physical or moral boundaries.
The war on terrorism is a multi-front campaign that begins at home.
In order to prepare for, prevent, and respond to attacks or domestic emergencies within the United States and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Civil Air Patrol, operating as the United States Air Force Auxiliary, increased its participation in Department of Defense Homeland Security operations by conducting Civil Support and Homeland Defense missions.
42 CAP provides a ready capability to enhance Civil Support and Homeland Defense operations within the HLS arena.
Utilizing highly-trained volunteers and its large fleet of aircraft, CAP can rapidly respond to requests for support from military, federal, state, and local agencies requiring emergency management services, integrated, multi-layered communications, low-cost, hightechnology reconnaissance, or transport of personnel or cargo.
CAP provides support to civilian law enforcement, participates in Domestic Relief Operations (DRO), and aids domestic consequence management activities in response to chemical, biological, radiological, nuclear, or high yield explosive (CBRNE) situations.
Increased CAP assistance in conducting Homeland Security operations acts as a force multiplier for the Department of Defense and other governmental and nongovernmental agencies.
By providing additional personnel and critical equipment, CAP gives first responders the flexibility to conduct higher priority taskings, and frees defense personnel for more critical national security needs.
To prepare for Homeland Security operations, CAP assists military and law enforcement organizations with training of personnel to defend the nation.
Activities ranging from active participation in exercises and evaluations, to transporting personnel, to training locations provide organizations with greater flexibility and reduce their own resource requirements.
Prevention missions usually involve active reconnaissance or patrol of potential targets, lines of communication and critical infrastructure.
Response, whether training or actual, involves virtually every aspect of the organization, but communications capabilities and trained emergency management personnel play key roles in addition to those filled by CAP air and ground teams.
By increasing the number of trained personnel and low-cost high-technology equipment available to full-time first responders, CAP leverages those organizations' abilities to provide capable, multi-level security.
Specifically, to enhance detection and prevention requirements, CAP provides reconnaissance and transportation capabilities not usually available to local security forces.
CAP emergency management personnel deliver much need continuity and often round out staffs normally manned with people whose primary duties may not involve crisis or consequence management.
CAP communications personnel establish critical redundancy in areas often overwhelmed with communication demands in commercial frequency spectra.
CAP Aircraft and Aircrews CAP owns approximately 530 single-engine, propeller driven light aircraft, such as Cessna 172s.
In addition, CAP members also make available about 4,500 of their own private aircraft, making Civil Air Patrol the largest privately owned light aircraft fleet in the world.
Combining corporate and member-owned aircraft, it has a larger fleet than the US Air Force.
Pilots may hold aeronautical ratings in CAP similar to pilots in the Air Force.
In addition, the CAP recognizes balloon and sailplane pilots with special ratings.
Aircrews are also eligible for aircrew designations, such as mission scanner and observer.
Cadets may receive primary flight training through Civil Air Patrol, while senior members may take proficiency training or upgrade the pilot's certificate they already have.
43 The CAP Communications Network The CAP communications network supports the entire CAP mission.
Involving thousands of operators, the Civil Air Patrol communications network serves three purposes: (1) it aids in the advancement and improvement of the art and science of radio communication; (2) furthers the CAP aerospace education phases in communication; and (3) coordinates with government agencies for planning and establishing procedures to meet local and national emergencies.
CAP's radio network is comprised of a radio and computer system involving stations that are fixed-land, mobile, water, and airborne.
This network embraces the entire CAP organization the 50 states, the District of Columbia, and Puerto Rico and maintains a regular communications schedule.
Whether it be for routine or emergency use, it provides commanders at each echelon the communications capability adequate for their control of overall activities.
Also, in times of national emergency or disaster, it provides an additional or secondary means of communications if primary facilities are inoperative.
Manned by CAP personnel, the CAP communications network follows the chain of command structure.
That is, the network is established at the national level, at the region level, the wing level, and the squadron level.
Operating in this manner, all echelons can maintain contact with each other using the network if the need arises.
Authorized frequencies are allocated by the US Air Force and Federal Communications Commission.
Civil Air Patrol maintains control of the network and establishes operating procedures which comply with the requirements of the USAF and FCC.
44 Drug Demand Reduction Where Counterdrug operations focus on eliminating the supply of illegal drugs into the united States, Drug Demand Reduction (DDR) focuses squarely on the demand for illegal drugs.
DDR, sponsored by the Department of Defense and the USAF, promotes a drug-and-gang-free lifestyle to youth across America, focusing primarily on the military community.
As the Auxiliary of the Air Force, CAP is an ideal agent for promoting drug demand reduction efforts, and CAP's DDR program is among the most successful programs in the country.
The focus of CAP's DDR efforts is middle school-age youth who reside within 30 miles of a qualifying Air Force installation, and mostly cater to CAP units.
These units receive DDR educational materials, access to guest speakers, and funding to support activities that promote a drug-free lifestyle.
A recent addition to CAP's DDR efforts is the formulation of the Middle School Initiative.
This program brings CAP into middle schools, providing activity materials, uniforms, and a comprehensive curricula into at-risk neighborhoods, at minimum cost to the school systems, providing a fun, structured program to thousands of youth every year.
Aerospace Education While listed as a specific part of the CAP mission, aerospace education activities actually permeate most of CAP's functions in one way or another.
There are two distinct programs within this part of the mission the internal program and the external program.
The internal program is for CAP members, for whom aerospace education follows a definite plan of participation and progression.
The external program is for nonmembers of CAP for teachers, school administrators, and other interested individuals.
The Internal Program The internal program for senior and cadet CAP members is designed to provide a general knowledge of all aerospace activities, along with an appreciation of how these activities impact society.
Here, the aerospace education program is based on activities and study.
Aerospace education is enriched by guest lecturers who are specialists in a particular facet of aerospace activity, visits to aerospace installations, participation in aerospace-related activities, and practical experience with aerospace equipment, such as flights in contemporary aircraft.
The External Program All other aerospace education activities in which CAP is involved are considered external aerospace education.
Participating in this category are those educational institutions wanting to provide an aerospace education program for their students.
CAP provides free materials and guidance.
In each region, the Civil Air Patrol employs an educator who is known as the Region Director of Aerospace Education (RDAE).
One of their responsibilities is to assist educational institutions in planning aerospace 45 CAP brings aerospace education into America's schools.
education projects, generally referred to as "workshops."
The assistance may come directly from the RDAE or may be come from the wing or squadron level.
In any case, CAP assists in making arrangements, ideas for presentations, providing guest lecturers and other activities for aerospace education courses and workshops.
Aerospace education for the general public is given through exhibits and demonstration; cooperative programs with business, fraternal, civil and service organizations all of which are conducted as a public service.
Through these programs, aerospace education fosters our nation's commitment to the future.
One of the most notable examples of this commitment is the National Congress on Aviation and Space Education (NCASE).
Sponsored by Civil Air Patrol and supported by organizations such as the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) and the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA), it is designed to promote an understanding of aerospace education throughout the nation.
This motivational program encourages teachers to incorporate aerospace education in their curricula and leaders to speak out on the aerospace issues facing our nation today.
National Congress on Aviation and Space Education logo In an age when we are constantly striving to move faster, do more, in less time, it is the aerospace world which will develop the technology in travel, in medicine, in computer sciences, to allow us to achieve those goals.
In addition, current events point out the achievements of other nations in aerospace technology, which may threaten the security and prestige of America.
CAP believes that the United States can only maintain its leadership only by paralleling or excelling the achievements of other countries.
To do this, it is a must that general education in aerospace activities be emphasized now and in the future.
Such education makes the public more aware of the necessity for progress in this area, and it can help make the public more receptive to tackling the challenges that lie ahead.
Too, the education of our youth in the wide spectrum of aerospace related sciences ensures our nation's future supply of trained scientists dedicated to preserving America's place as the preeminent developer of aerospace technology in the world.
The Cadet Program The cadet program is designed to foster leadership and good citizenship in America's youth, using aerospace education, Air Force role models and emphasis on public service.
Cadets may participate in a variety of activities, gain rank and increased recognition in the program and receive benefits for participation in the program should they choose to enter military service.
Most of all, it challenges them to learn and grow in ways they may not have had the opportunity to were it not for the program.
Cadet Program Structure The Cadet Program itself is divided into five phases the Motivation Phase, and four primary phases (the Learning Phase, the Leadership Phase, the Command Phase, and the Executive Phase) dedicated phases for learning and growth.
The Motivation Phase introduces the prospective cadet to the requirements, procedures and goals of CAP.
After the Motivation Phase, the next four phases use aerospace education, leadership, physical fitness, and moral leadership to instill and develop qualities of leadership and responsibilities in the cadet members.
The entire cadet program is oriented toward an activities program held within the 46 individual squadron setting.
Activities selected by a squadron for its program are designed to meet the individual member's need.
Throughout the cadet program, from the first achievement through to the completion of the program; emphasis is placed on individual and group study, instruction and attainment.
Each of the four phases emphasizes the four program areas mentioned above as well as individual unit activities, such as drill team, color guard, model rocketry, and emergency services training.
As cadets progress, they earn ribbons, awards, and increased grade, rewarding their commitment and achievement in the program.
Each phase becomes more challenging and builds on what the cadet has already learned.
Phase I, the Learning Phase is just that: cadets learn to function in a military-type environment.
They learn to march, wear their uniform properly, learn the principles of followership, and begin to learn about the aerospace environment.
CAP cadets receive a visit from an Air Force member.
In Phase II, the Leadership Phase, cadets become more involved in the program.
They may enter leadership roles in their squadron and attend a CAP encampment, which is designed to give cadets an introduction to the Air Force culture and hands on leadership and aerospace training in a team environment.
It is at the conclusion of this phase that they receive the first major award for achievement in the Cadet Program, the General Billy Mitchell Award.
In Phase III, the Command Phase, the cadet is expected to take on greater responsibility for activities and training within their squadron.
They must assume a leadership position and mentor younger cadets in a variety of areas.
In addition, they must also become knowledgeable in different staff areas, learning from their senior member counterparts in areas such as public affairs.
This is in addition to continuing the activities they began in Phases I and II.
At the conclusion of this phase, the cadet may receive the Amelia Earhart Award and go on to the final phase of cadet training.
The achievements in Phase IV, the Executive Phase, are designed to provide high-level leadership experiences to the individual cadet.
When the cadet has completed the requirements for Phase IV, they will receive the General Ira C. Eaker Award and become eligible to test for the highest award for achievement in the Cadet Program, the General Carl A. Spaatz Award.
The Spaatz Award is a comprehensive evaluation of all aspects of the cadet program phases.
This exam is passed by less than one percent of the total cadet population.
Once a cadet has passed the Spaatz examination, they are promoted to the highest grade in the program, cadet colonel.
Most attend college and pursue aerospace careers; many have earned a pilot certificate; and all are advisors to those involved with conducting the cadet program.
Spaatz cadets continue to improve themselves through applying what they have learned throughout the cadet program and assisting other Did you know? The Spaatz Award was named after General Carl A. Spaatz, first Chief of Staff of the USAF, October 1947 April 1948, and first Chairman of the Board for Civil Air Patrol, 1948 - 1959.
cadets to excel.
47 Activities and Rewards Cadets at all levels of CAP enjoy a wide variety of activities at the squadron, wing and national level.
Cadets may train and participate in SAR missions, enjoy orientation flights, take field trips, go to the encampme nts we have described (mandatory for Phase II completion), etc.
In addition, they may become eligible to go on a variety of national activities designed to complement the cadet curriculum.
These activities cover a wide range of aerospace, emergency services, career exploration, and leadership topics.
Cadets may even qualify to travel to a foreign country to represent Civil Air Patrol and the United States.
CAP cadets learning to fly a sailplane Cadets may also qualify for college scholarships.
Cadets wanting to enlist in the Air Force and holding the Mitchell Award may enlist at a higher pay grade over their contemporaries.
This can mean thousands of extra dollars over a career.
The Cadet Program offers today's youth unlimited opportunities to excel.
CAP and Other Organizations Along with our increasing population and growing complexity of our society, many government, private, and non-profit organizations and clubs are undertaking tasks similar to those performed by Civil Air Patrol.
To those organizations CAP offers its cooperation and assistance.
And in turn they assist CAP. Civil Air Patrol works cooperatively with civil emergency service units on both practical and actual missions.
As you recall, CAP is quick to offer assistance to educational institutions wanting to incorporate aerospace education into their curriculum.
In fact, CAP will offer all assistance it is capable of giving to any reputable private organization.
These other organizations reciprocate by taking part in CAP programs.
Some organizations provide reference materials.
Others publicize CAP and its activities in their bulletins and house organs.
Still others offer scholarships.
Some private organizations sponsor existing CAP cadet or composite squadrons, or help new squadrons form and concurrently provide leadership, meeting places or other assistance.
Civil Air Patrol is not in competition with any other benevolent organization.
To provide the greatest service possible to our nation, CAP enthusiastically cooperates with all organizations having similar goals.
The success of the overall CAP mission depends on this cooperation and the performance and enthusiasm of Civil Air Patrol members at all levels.
Just a few of the organizations Civil Air patrol has worked with in recent years locally and/or nationally include:      American Red Cross US Customs service Federal Emergency Management Agency US Coast Guard US Coast Guard Auxiliary 48               Drug Enforcement Administration Emergency management agencies of all states Boy Scouts of America Explorer Scouts Local law enforcement/fire departments JTF-6 Department of Defense Experimental Aircraft Association "Young Eagles" Air Force Association Space Camp The Congressional Awards Who's Who Daedalians USAA Conclusion Civil Air Patrol youth outreach for neighbors, CAP has bears the distinction has been serving America through search and rescue, aerospace education, and six decades.
From a fledgling organization working tirelessly to protect its grown into one of America's largest public service organizations, and proudly of being the official auxiliary of the US Air Force.
CAP, be assured that it is extremely important to CAP's total mission, on the accomplishments of each member.
The work we perform excellence, thereby evolving us from volunteers into "unpaid can continue to build on the strong foundation of service that is the Whatever role you play in for CAP's success depends demands us to strive for professionals."
Together, we CAP legacy.
49
